ntly on me the judge a sentence past,
  To the place of execution they brought me to a tree,
  And may God forgive my mistress for she has wronged me.

  All you who come to see me now, hear before I die,
  Don't laugh at my downfall nor smile at my disgrace,
  Believe me I'm quite innocent, I bid this world adieu,
  Farewell my dearest Polly, I die thro' loving you.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 198: From a broadside in Mr. Hailstone's coll., collated with
one _penes me_.]




THE YORKSHIRE VOLUNTEERS' FAREWELL TO THE GOOD FOLKS OF STOCKTON.[199]

BY HERBERT STOCKHORE, PRIVATE IN EARL FAUCONBERG'S YORKSHIRE NORTH
RIDING VOLUNTEERS.


  Tune, "_Push about the Jorum_."

  Ye Stockton lads and lasses too,
    Come listen to my story,
  A dismal tale, because 'tis true,
    I've now to lay before ye;
  We must away, our rout is come,
    We scarce refrain from tears O,
  Shrill shrieks the fife, rough roars the drum,
    March, Yorkshire Volunteers, O.
                        Fal lal lal la ral.

  Yet ere we part, my comrades say,
    Come, Stockhore, you're the poet,
  If ere you'd pen a grateful lay,
    'Tis now the time to show it;
  Such usage kind, in these good towns,
    We've met from age and youth, sirs,
  Accept our heartfelt thanks, and once
    A poet sings the truth, sirs.
                                Fal lal, &c.

  Ye lasses too, of all I see,
    Ye're fairest in the nation;
  Sweet buds of beauty's blooming tree,
    The top of the creation;
  Full many of our lads, I ween,
    Have got good wives and true, sirs,
  I wonder what our leaders mean,
    They have not done so too, sirs.
                                Fal lal, &c.

  Perhaps--but hark! the thund'ring drum
    From love to arms is beating;
  Our country calls, we come, we come,
    Great George's praise repeating;
  He's great and good, long may he here
    Reign, every bliss possessing,
  And long may each true volunteer
    Behold him Britain's blessing.
                                Fal lal, &c.

  Our valiant earl[200] shall lead us on,
    The nearest way to glory,
  Bright honour hails her darling son,
    And fame records his story;
  Dundas commands upon our lists
    The second, tho' on earth, sirs,
  No one his second to, exists,
    For courage, sense, and worth, sirs.
                               Fal lal, &c.

  No venal muse before your view,
    Next sets a veteran bold, sirs,
  The praise to merit justly due,
    From Paul she cannot hold, sirs;
  His valour oft has bore the test,
    In war he's brisk and handy;
  His private virtues stand confest,
    In short, he's quite the dandy.
                               Fal lal, &c.

  Brave Mackarall heads his grenadiers,
    They're just the lads to do it,
  And should the dons or lank Monsieurs
    Come here, he'll make them rue it.
  He'll roar his thunder, make them flee,
    With a row, row, row, row, rara,
  And do them o'er by land,--at sea,
    As Rodney did Langara.[201]

  Young Thompson and his lads so light
    Of foot, with hearts of steel, O,
  His country's cause shall nobly fight,
    And make her foes to feel, O,
  For should the frog-fed sons of Gaul,
    Come capering à la Francois,
  "My lads," said he, "we'll teach them all
    The light-bob country dance, A."
                               Fal lal, &c.

  Our leaders all so brave and bold,
    Shou'd I in verse recite, A,
  A baggage waggon wou'd not hold
    The songs that I cou'd write, A:
  Their deeds so great, their words so mild,
    O take our worst commander,
  And to him Cæsar was a child,
    And so was Alexander.
                               Fal lal, &c.

  Such men as these we'll follow thro'
    The world, and brave all danger;
  Each volunteer is firm and true,
    His heart's to fear a stranger;
  Good folks farewell, God bless the king,
    With angels centry o'er him;
  Now, hark! to Winchester, we'll sing,
    And push about the jorum.
                               Fal lal lal la ral.

FOOTNOTES:

[Footnote 199: Called in the Rox. coll., "Hark to Winchester; or, The
Yorkshire Volunteers, &c."]

[Footnote 200: Henry, last earl Fauconberg, only son of Thomas 1st earl.
He was lord lieutenant and custos rotulorum of the North Riding of
Yorkshire, and Lord of the Bedchamber to George III; died 23 March,
1802, and was buried at Coxwold.]

[Footnote 201: On the 16 Jan. 1780, admiral Rodney met a Spanish
squadron off Cape St. Vincent, under the command of admiral Don Juan du
Langara, and completely defeated it; capturing the Phoenix, of 80
guns, bearing the flag of the admiral, the Monarca, Princessa, and
Diligenta, each of 70 guns. The St. Domingo, of 70 guns, blown up; and
the San Julian and San Eugenio, of 70 guns, surrendered: while the
British had the trifling loss of only 32 men killed and 120 wounded.
Both houses of parliament voted Rodney thanks for his conduct upon the
occasion, and the freedom of the city of London was presented him in a
gold box valued at 100 guineas. Lord Rodney, K.B., died 24 May, 1792.]




FRAGMENT OF THE HAGMENA SONG.[202]


As sung at Richmond, Yorkshire, on the eve of the New-Year, by the
Corporation Pinder.

  To-night it is the New-year's night, to morrow is the day,
  And we are come for our right, and for our ray,[203]
  As we used to do in old king Henry's day.
                Sing, fellows, sing, Hagman-heigh.

  If you go to the bacon-flick, cut me a good bit;
  Cut, cut and low, beware of your maw;
  Cut, cut and round, beware of your thumb,
  That me and my merry men may have some.
                Sing, fellows, sing, Hagman-heigh.

  If you go to the black-ark, bring me X mark;
  Ten mark, ten pound, throw it down upon the ground,
  That me and my merry men may have some.
                Sing, fellows, sing, Hagman-heigh.

FOOTNOTES:

[Footnote 202: The custom of singing Hagmena songs is observed in
different parts of the north of England, and in Scotland. The origin of
the term is a matter of dispute. Some derive it from "au guy l'an
neuf," _to the misletoe this new year_; others suppose the term to be a
corruption of hagia mênê, _the holy month_. The Hagmena songs
are sometimes sung on Christmas Eve, and sometimes, as at Richmond, on
the eve of the new year. See BRAND'S _Popular Antiquities_.]

[Footnote 203: "Ray, ree, or rey, a Portuguese coin, 100 of which are
equal to sixpence English."--CLARKSON'S _Richmond_.]




THE FAIR.[204]


  Ye loit'ring minnits faster flee,
  Ye're all ower slaw behawf for me,
    That wait impatient for the moornin';
  To-moorn's the lang, lang wish'd for fair,
  Ah'll try te shine the fooremust there,
    Mysen i' finest cleeas adoornin',
                        Te grace the day.

  Ah'll put mah best white stockings on,
  An' pair o' new cawf-leather shoon,
    My cleean-wesh'd goon o' printed cotton;
  Aboot my neck a muslin shawl,
  A new silk hankercher ower all,
    Wi' sike a careless air ah'll put on,
                        Ah'll shine that day.

  My partner Ned, ah knaw, thinks he,
  "He'll mak' his sen secure o' me,"
    He's ofens sed he'd treeat me rarely;
  Bud ah sal think ov other fun,
  Ah'll aim for sum rich farmer's son,
    An' cheeat our simple Neddy fairly,
                        Sea sly that day.

  Why mud ah nut succeed as weel,
  An' get a man full oot genteel,
    As awd John Darby's dowghter Nelly;
  Ah think mysen as good as she,
  She can't mak' cheese or spin like me,
    That's mare 'an beauty, let me tell ye,
                        On onny day.

  Then hey! for spoorts an' puppy shows,
  An' temptin' spice-stalls, rang'd i' rows,
    An' danglin' dolls, by t' necks all hangin',
  An' thoosand other pratty seeghts,
  An' lasses, trail'd alang the streets,
    Wi' lads, te t' yal-house gangin',
                              Te drink that day.

  Let's leeak at t' winder,--ah can see 't,
  It seeams as tho' 'twas growin' leeght,
    The cloods wi' early rays adoornin',
  Ye loit'ring minnits faster flee,
  Ye're all ower slaw' behawf for me
    'At wait impatient for the moornin',
                              O' sike a day.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 204: From _A Garland of New Songs_, without printer's name.]




THE YORKSHIRE LAD IN LONDON.


  When I left father and mother, sister and brother,
    They all cried you'll surely be undone;
  For resolved was I my fortune to try,
    And just take a trip to London--
  Cry'd my father, "When there, dont curse and swear
    As the Londoners do if they teaze ye,
  But your passion keep down as well as you can,
    And say--Jemmy Johnson squeeze me."

  "Lord, father, do you take me for a fool,
    That was in Yorkshire born and bred, man;
  I'm not to be done by the London chaps,
    As long as I've eyes in my head, man;
  And should they think for to go to contrive
    With their cunning and tricks to tease me,
  I, as well as they, know how many beans make five
    If I dont then--Jemmy Johnson squeeze me."

  I went to the play, I went to the park, saw the king,
    To see all the grand sights I were willing,
  But when I came at night to count o'er my brass,
    Egad I found I'd took two bad shillings.
  "If the Yorkshire lads were to know it," says I,
    "Oh dear how they would teaze me."
  But some kind friend shall have them again,
    If they dont, why--Jemmy Johnson squeeze me.

  A fine lady came up, half drunk in the street,
    Thinking for me to nicely trepan, sir;
  For you see I being drest in my best,
    She called me a handsome young man, sir;
  "And sir, if along with me you'll go," says she,
    "I think as how I should so please ye."
  So I went--and I gave her the two bad shillings,
    If I didn't--Jemmy Johnson squeeze me.

  Then a stranger came up, says he, "My dear friend,
    I'm glad in London to meet you;
  Do you know me?" says he--says I, "Very well,
    Come to the public house and I'll treat you."
  So I called for the liquor--got half drunk,
    Where the chap he thought to ease me,
  But I walked me away, left him the reckoning to pay,
    If I didn't--Jemmy Johnson squeeze me.

  Then another chap called me on the other side,
    Says he, "Look, I've found a gold ring, sir,
  If you'll ten shillings give me, yours it shall be."
    "Oh!" says I, "'tis a grand looking thing, sir,
  But I tell you what, my sweet London chap,
    Dont think of my money to ease me,
  For a Yorkshire lad knows brass from gold,
    If he don't--then Jemmy Johnson squeeze me."

  I was tired of their tricks, says I, "I'll go home,
    While all's right, tight, and comely;
  For a rolling stone gathers no moss,
    And home is home if it's ever so homely."
  But I made 'em remember 'for I left town,
    They thought how it did please me,
  That the Yorkshire lad was not to be had,
    If he was--Jemmy Johnson squeeze me.




THE TRYAL OF PATIENCE.[205]


Being a relation of a widow in Yorkshire, who, having buried her
husband, and left seven small children, was reduced to great poverty,
and turned out of house and home; then going to her husband's brother,
being a rich man, in hopes of finding relief, but instead thereof he
threatened them with cruelty. With an account of a lady's love at the
greatest time of her distress.

  To the tune of "_In Summer Time_."

  A loving couple in Yorkshire,
    They having seven children small,
  When poverty was so severe,
    They had for them no food at all.

  As I the naked truth may speak,
    Their father was in grief and woe,
  Three years he lay both sick and weak,
    This was enough to bring them low.

  They sold their cattle, corn, and hay,
    With other goods they parted free,
  Till all they had was made away,
    In this their sad extremity.

  After the term of three long years,
    Which he thus languishing did lye,
  Upon his bed, with brinish tears,
    He said, "Farewell, here now I dye."

  A cruel landlord the next day,
    Turn'd her and children out of door,
  Where in a field all night they lay;
    This griev'd the widow's heart full sore.

  Poor soul, she was in sad distress.
    Full seven children at her feet,
  With hunger, cold and comfortless,
    And not one bit of bread to eat.

  Her children cry'd to her alone;
    "O, give us food, mother," they said;
  'Twould have broke a heart of stone,
    To hear the piteous moan they made.

  With weeping tears she did reply,
    "My heart is overwhelm'd with grief;
  To your rich uncle we will hye,
    And see if he will yield relief.

  "He told your father thus in love,
    Before this world he bid adieu,
  That he in tenderness would prove
    A brother and a father too."

  With cheerfulness they did repair,
    Unto their uncle's house that night,
  And they no sooner were come there,
    But all their hopes were blasted quite.

  As soon as he did them behold,
    He said to her, "What make you here?
  Begone, or else the whipping post,
    Shall surely happen to your share."

  He threatened her with this abuse,
    Likewise with greater villany,
  He vow'd his dog he would let loose,
    If that she did his patience try.

  In wrath he spurn'd them from his door,
    Saying they should not there abide;
  Her children they were frighten'd sore,
    She likewise wrung her hands and cry'd.

  "O here we will not tarry long,
    Although we are in deep distress;
  Dear brother, pray now do not wrong
    The widow and the fatherless."

  Tears from their eyes in showers did flow,
    For there they see they might not stay;
  Their hearts were fill'd with grief and woe,
    As from his house they took their way.

  The mother was with grief opprest,
    The children in a woful plight;
  "We have no home nor place of rest,
    Where shall we lay our heads this night?"

  As she did wander on the way,
    Alas! her very heart did bleed;
  "Good Lord, raise me some friend, I pray,
    To help us in this time of need."

  Her prayer was heard to heaven high,
    For she no sooner this had said,
  But a young lady riding by,
    Did hear the piteous moan she made.

  And call'd her to her coach with speed,
    Giving her ten good guineas there,
  In order for her present need,
    And bid her to her house repair.

  "A farm of twenty pounds a year,
    I do declare I have in store,
  And I will give thee title clear,
    To you and yours for evermore."

  The lady bid her cease to mourn,
    "For ever happy may you be;"
  Ten thousand thanks she did return
    For this her generosity.

  No tongue is able to express
    How joy and comforts did increase,
  For now the farm they do possess,
    And live in plenty, joy, and peace.

  This brother of malicious spite,
    Who would not pity her poor case,
  All that he had was blasted quite
    Within a very little space.

  God's wrath and vengeance here we see,
    Was just for his sad cruel pride;
  He was reduc'd to poverty,
    Likewise upon a dunghill dy'd.

  For having then no home nor friend.
    That would this cruel wretch receive,
  He made a miserable end,
    When he, alas! this life did leave.

  Rich men, relieve the poor, I pray,
    Who does to you for succour cry,
  Lest you be brought as low as they,
    By making God your enemy.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 205: From a broadside in the Rox. Coll., black letter. Printed
for P. Brooksby, at the Golden Ball in Pye Corner.]




THE BEGGAR'S BRIDGE.

BY MRS. GEORGE DAWSON.


  They talk of dales and hills in Wales,
      As the loveliest in our isle;
  But the Yorkshire dells and rocky fells,
  Where the bright sun beams on the sparkling streams,
      Are all forgot the while.

  You may roam for hours 'mid sweet spring flowers,
      With a gurgling "beck" beneath,
  While the rustling breeze just parts the trees,
  And reveals the sweep of the wild woods deep,
      Shut in the darkling heath.

  You may hear the note of the blackbird float,
      From the top of each tall ash tree,
  When he pours his song each evening long;
  For in "true love" tales such romantic dales,
      Must needs abundant be.

  The dalesmen say that their light archway
      Is due to an Egton[206] man,
  Whose love was tried by a whelming tide;
  I heard the tale in its native vale,
      And thus the legend ran:--

    "Why lingers my lov'd one? Oh! why does he roam
    On the last winter's evening that hails him at home?
    He promised to see me once more ere he went,
    But the long rays of gloaming all lonely I've spent:
    The stones at the fording no longer I see;
    Ah! the darkness of night has concealed them from me."

    The maiden of Glaisdale sat lonely at eve,
    And the cold stormy night saw her hopelessly grieve;
    But when she looked forth from her casement at morn,
    The maiden of Glaisdale was truly forlorn!
    For the stones were engulphed where she looked for them last
    By the deep swollen Esk, that rolled rapidly past;
    And vainly she strove with her tear-bedimmed eye,
    The pathway she gazed on last night to descry.

    Her lover had come to the brink of the tide,
    And to stem its swift current repeatedly tried;
    But the rough whirling eddy still swept him ashore,
    And relentlessly bade him attempt it no more.
    Exhausted he climbed the steep side of the brae,
    And looked up the dale ere he turned him away;
    Ah! from her far window a light flickered dim,
    And he knew she was faithfully watching for him.

  "I go to seek my fortune, love,
    In a far, far distant land;
  And without thy parting blessing, love,
    I am forced to quit the strand.

  "But over Arncliffe's brow, my love,
    I see thy twinkling light;
  And when deeper waters part us, love,
    'Twill be my beacon bright.

  "If fortune ever favour me,
    St. Hilda! hear my vow!
  No lover again in my native plain,
    Shall be thwarted as I am now.

  "One day I'll come to claim my bride,
    As a worthy and wealthy man!
  And my well earned gold shall raise a bridge
    Across this torrent's span."

    The rover came back from a far distant land,
    And he claimed of the maiden her long-promised hand;
    But he built, ere he won her, the bridge of his vow,
    And the lovers of Egton pass over it now.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 206: "On first entering the village of Egton (near Whitby),
instead of proceeding forward, take the road through a gate to the
right, which leads past the church of Limber Hill, a winding and steep
descent, which affords, from several points, fine views of Eskdale and
Glaisdale, and at the foot of which the Beggar's Bridge, with its
elegant single arch, bestrides the river Esk."--REED'S _Guide to
Whitby_.]




THE BANKS O' MORTON O' SWALE.[207]


  As autumn pour'd her teern o' good,
      And woe had ceased to wail,
  Ah wander'd forth hard by a woode,
      Upon the banks o' Swale.

  And there ah spied a lovely nymph
      Yan that neean could but hail,
  Ah sed, "Sweet lass, come take e trip
      Alang the banks o' Swale."

  Wi' looks as sweet as angels wear,
      She soon was in the vale,
  And ah was walking by my fair
      Upon the banks o' Swale.

  But ah sall neear forget that night,
      Whale life or memory fail,
  The hours they pass'd wi' syke delight,
      Upon the banks o' Swale.

  They swifter flew than did the stream,
      That murmur'd en the dale,
  For mah enjoyment was extreme
      Upon the banks o' Swale.

  Ah lov'd that lass as meh life,
      Ah felt to wish her weal,
  Ah ask'd her to become my wife
      Upon the banks o' Swale.

  Wi' looks bespeaking mind intent
      On what ah ardent tell,
  E' vain ah woo'd her to consent
      Upon the banks o' Swale.

  Ah kiss'd, ah press'd her to gi way
      But all of no availe,
  She had a wooer far away
      Fra the sweet banks o' Swale.

  A drinking ranting wretch wes hee,
      As ever was out o' hell,
  She took his hand and spurned me
      Far fra the banks o' Swale.

  But ah! when years had roll'd away
      Ah met a form full frail,
  She recognised me that day
      As fra the banks o' Swale.

  Said ah full low, "Can this be she,
      This thing of woe and wail,
  That ah yance kiss'd delightfully
      Upon the banks o' Swale?"

  O, heavens it was the very one
      Ah met e' that sweet vale,
  But ah the evary charm was gone,
      Ah saw ont' banks o' Swale.

  Wi' sorrow stamp'd on her brow
      She did her mind unveil,
  She told me all she had pass'd thro'
      Since on the banks o' Swale.

  But O her history how sad,
      To sad for me to tell,
  T'wad mak e' heart o' stane to bleed,
      Ah mourn ye banks o' Swale.

  Then ye nymphs that mak sea free
      Wi' laddies that love ale,
  Ah think of her that went wi' me
      Upon the banks o' Swale.

  And spurn syke wooers that wad woo
      Ye to become their wife,
  For knaw 'e this, if ye do
      Ye 'd ruined be for life.[208]

FOOTNOTES:

[Footnote 207: A pleasant straggling village, in the parish of Ainderby
Steeple, near North Allerton, on the east bank of the Swale. Lambard,
Bede, and other early writers, inform us that Paulinus, the first
archbishop of York, baptized 10,000 persons in this river in one
day,--"By cause at that tyme theare weare no churches or oratories yet
buylt."]

[Footnote 208: Communicated by Mr. Wm. Todd, of Keckmondwike, author of
"T' Country Chap," &c.]




THE CHASE OF THE BLACK FOX.


This ballad, communicated by Mr. Wm. Grainge,[209] of Minskip, has never
been printed, and is little known. The tradition on which it is founded
is yet related by old people in the midland parts of Yorkshire, and the
incidents recited in the narrative are very nearly those related by the
tongue of "hoary eld."

  Listen, Yorkshire gentlemen,
    Unto the tale I tell,
  'Tis of a strange adventure
    That once a lord befel,

  Who took his way with horse and hound,
    With huntsman and with horn,
  To chase the wily fox I ween,
    One autumn's merry morn.

  Long did they seek the cunning one,
    And roamed with labour vain,
  Through many a thorny thicket,
    O'er many a woody plain;

  No traces of sly reynard,
    Their closest search can find,
  There is no track upon the ground,
    No scent upon the wind.

  The hunters are impatient all,
    The huntsman swears, "In vain
  We've beaten round, we've beaten square,
    No fox is on the plain.

  "We might as well call off the hounds
    And come another day,
  Old N--k must have been hunting here
    And driven them away."

  "If we had caught him in the act,"
    The angry lord replies,
  "We would have chased him home again,
    And made his brush our prize:

  "Or if he would but come to day,
    We'd give him such a run,
  As he ne'er had in all his life,
    O, 'twould be noble fun!"

  So spake the lord and huntsman,
    When to their great surprise,
  A noble fox unkenelled
    Before their wondering eyes,

  As black as any raven,
    As glossy and as bright,
  Save that his brush--no hunter's prize,
    Is tipp'd with shining white.

  The huntsman wakes from wonder,
    And gives a cheering blast,
  The hounds reply in thunder,
    The hunters follow fast.

  Away they go a gallant band,
    Ye would have thought they flew;
  Their horses were the fleetest
    That Yorkshire ever knew.

  O'er many a lofty fence they pass,
    O'er many a gate and stile,
  The sable one is leading them
    Many a dreary mile.

  And always full before their eyes,
    Nor far before the hound,
  But all their speed to catch him
    Is ever fruitless found.

  The hunters now are tiring,
    Or lagging far behind,
  But yet the fox is running
    As merrily as the wind.

  The staunchest hounds are wearied
    With the fruitless chase,
  The angry lord and huntsman
    Alone maintain the race.

  When at the sinking of the day
    They gain'd a river's side,
  Without a moment's stop or stay
    The fox takes to the tide.

  Here stop the lord and huntsman,
    Their courage is no more,
  They dare not trust their horses
    Amidst the waves of Yore.

  Both hound, and horse, and hunters,
    Are fairly tired and done,
  For since the game was started,
    Full three score miles they'd run.

  While light as cork on water
    The fox was floating on,
  You could not tell by seeing him,
    A furlong he had run.

  He swam into the middle,
    Then turned him round about,
  And by the hunters on the bank
    Was heard to laugh and shout.

  "Ho! ho! ye gallant hunters!
    When must I come again?
  For never shall ye want a fox,
    To chase along the plain.

  "And when your need is greatest,
    But call upon my name,
  And I will come--and you shall have
    The best of sport and game."

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 209: Author of the "Vale of Mowbray," &c: to whom I am
indebted for the "Collingham Ghost," and "The Widow's Lament."]




MISS BAILEY'S GHOST.[210]


  A captain bold in Halifax, who dwelt in country quarters
  Seduced a maid who hang'd herself one morning in her garters;
  His wicked conscience smited him, he lost his stomach daily,
  He took to drinking ratafia, and thought upon miss Bailey.
          Oh miss Bailey! unfortunate miss Bailey.

  One night, betimes, he went to rest, for he had caught a fever,
  Says he, "I am a handsome man, but I'm a gay deceiver."
  His candle just at twelve o'clock began to burn quite palely,
  A ghost stepp'd up to his bed-side and said, "Behold miss Bailey!"
          Oh miss Bailey! unfortunate miss Bailey!

  "Avaunt, miss Bailey," then he cried, "your face looks white and mealy."
  "Dear captain Smith," the ghost replied, "you've used me ungenteely;
  The crowner's 'quest goes hard with me, because I've acted frailly,
  And Parson Biggs won't bury me, though I am dead miss Bailey."
          Oh miss Bailey! unfortunate miss Bailey!

  "Dear corpse," said he, "since you and I, accounts must once for all
     close,
  I've got a one pound note in my regimental small clothes;
  'Twill bribe the sexton for your grave."--The ghost then vanish'd gaily,
  Crying, "Bless you, wicked captain Smith, remember poor miss Bailey."
          Oh miss Bailey! unfortunate miss Bailey.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 210: This song first appeared, in 1805, in Colman's "Love
laughs at Locksmiths." See a Latin version of this song by the Rev. G.
H. Glasse, in Gent. Mag. for Aug. 1805.]




THE TWO YORKSHIRE LOVERS.[211]


    To the Tune of "_Willy_."

  When Willy once he stayed,
  To fetch home a lamb that straied,
      Under a hill-side,
      A bonny lasse he spide,
  Of whom he was well apaied.

  Her cheeks like cherries growing,
  Her lips like rose-buds blowing;
      Her eyes black and cleare,
      As the sloe upon the breere,
  Or the worme in the hedge lies glowing.

  Her waist so small and slender,
  Her skin so soft and tender,
      He sigh'd and he said
      That she was a fair maid,
  And his love to her he'd render.

  The wind did seem to play
  With her tresses as she lay;
      Betwixt hope and feare,
      He was in despaire,
  To give her the time of the day.

  Yet resolv'd to court this minion,
  There stept in a new opinion;
      This timorous clowne
      Thought Phoebe had come down
  To speake with her loved Endimion.

  His errand quite forgotten,
  He lean'd to a tree was rotten;
      He swore by the masse,
      There was never such a lasse!
  His heart with a shaft was shotten.

  Then boldly he stept unto her,
  His eyes shot affection through her;
      He cast away fears,
      And pricking up his ears,
  Thus Willy began to wooe her.

  "Good day," quoth he, "my honny!
  Thou dearer to me than money;
      I'le lose my little lambe,
      And gladly give the damme,
  To be lov'd by a lasse so bonny.

  "Now list to what I'le tell thee,
  There's none in shape doth excell thee,
      So thou wilt wed me,
      None happier than thee;
  For better day ere befell me.

  "Of nuts I'le give thee plenty,
  And red side apples twenty;
      My butter I'le leese,
      To make thee summer cheese,
  And creame to make egge-pies dainty.

  "My lambs new gowns shall bear thee,
  No daylockes shall ere come near thee;
      The poultry of the towne
      Shall cackle without downe,
  Ere I'le want a soft bed to cheer thee.

  "My bagpipes mirth shall make thee,
  Each morn with a song I'le wake thee;
      At night I'le not faile
      To tell a merry tale,
  And make thy sad thoughts forsake thee."


  THE SECOND PART.

  "White lillies shall pave the closes,
  Each brier shall blush with roses;
      The gross green and sweet,
      Shall kiss thy tender feet,
  And the medows shall yield thee posies.

  "With shady bowers set ore thee,
  With thousand contents I'le store thee;
      While by some clear brooke,
      With my little dog and hooke,
  I'le bring my fine ewes before thee."

  While thus he was close set at her,
  Quoth she, "I suspect the matter,
      For an houres sport;
      Like the false alluring court,
  The country has learned to flatter.

  "Therefore leave off thy wooing;
  I love not such short doing,
      And come unto the matter;
      I love not for to flatter,
  True affection hates long suing.

  "But if your love will prove steady,
  Till Hymen had made him ready,
      Then surfeit all night
      In a captive maids delight,
  Which yet but ayre hath fed ye."

  Quoth he, "I love none above thee,
  For chastity I prove thee;
      As constant I'le prove,
      As the mate unto the dove,
  Nay, though thou wert dead, I'le love thee!

  "And all contents I'le give thee,
  So that thou wilt live with me;
      My life and all I'le loose,
      Ere I my love abuse,
  And all my rich kith unto me."

  As Willy thus was talking,
  The shepherd's eyes were walking;
      Each legge and each limbe,
      So tricked, so trim,
  She thought it no time of balking.

  Her heart with love was taken,
  God Cupid did her awaken;
      And cast a cheerfull eye,
      Upon him by and by,
  To show he was not forsaken.

  His lips to hers he laid,
  She never a word gain-said;
      Thus joyning their hands,
      They tyed the nuptiall bands,
  Which never till death decai'd.

  Such happy joy God send me,
  When I to wed intend me;
      And to each faithfull lover,
      Where they be one or other,
  I heartily commend thee.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 211: From a broadside in the Rox. Coll., black letter. London,
printed for John Wright.]




NATTERIN NAN.

BE A YORKSHUR LIKENASS TAKER.[212]


  Noa daht ye'll all ev eard abaht
    T' Appolloa Belvidere,
  A statty, thowt be sum ta be
    Fro' ivvery failin tlear.

  All reyt an streyt i' mak and shap,
    A mould for t'race o' men,
  A dahnreyt, upreyt, beng-up chap,
    Nut mitch unlike mesen.

  Nah, thaw ye knaw he's nowt bud stoan,
    He lewks sa grand an big,
  That little durst ya pool his noas,
    Ur lug his twisted wig.

  Pratly, reyt pratly, ovver t'floor,
    A tep e toas ye walk,
  An hod yur breeath for varry awe,
    An whisper when ya tauk.

  There's that abaht him, bud I knaw'nt
    Nut reytly hah ta say't,
  That maks ya feel as small as thieves
    Anent a magistrate.

  Yee've seen that dolt o'mucky tlay,
    O't face o' Pudsa Doas,
  T'owd madlin 's worn it all his life,
    An fancied it a noas.

  Yond props is like a pair o' tengs
    O' Sykes's, yet by t' megs,
  When he wur souber as a judge,
    A've eard him call em legs.

  So Heaven be praised for self-consate,
    Withaht it ah sud say
  Wee'se hate wursen we all wur meet
    For ivver an a day.

  When sitch like lewks at t' marble God
    Egoy! ha wide they gape,
  An wunder which they favver t'moast,
    A boggard or an ape.

  An sum we envy and we spite
    Get filled ta that degree,
  They'd knock his noas off if they durst,
    Or give him a black ee.

  He sumhah kests a leet on things
    'At fowk noan wants ta see,
  Thear's few likes tellin what they are
    Or what they owt ta be.

  Wah, wah, purfecshun nivver did
    To Adam's bairns beleng,
  An lewk at mortals as we will
    We fynd a summat wreng.

  For Adam gate so mesht wi't fall,
    That all o't human race
  Grow sadly aht o' shap it mind,
    I't karkiss an it' face.

  There's noan sa blynd bud tha can see
    Sum fawts i' other men;
  A've sumtimes met we fowk 'at thowt
    They saw sum i' thersen.

  An t'best o' chaps al fynd thersen
    At times i' t' fawty dlass,
  A've doubled t'neiv, afoar ta day,
    At t' fooil i't seemin dlass.

  Bud twarst o' fawts at a've seen yet,
    I' woman ur i' man,
  Is t'weary naagin nengin turn,
    'At plagued poor Natterin Nan.

  A' went one summer afternoin
    Ta see hur poar owd man,
  An aadly bed I darkened t'door,
    When t'worrit thus began:

  "A-wah did ivver! wot a treat,
    Ta see thy father's sun,
  Come forrad lad an sit ta dahn,
    An al set t' kettle on."

  "Nay, nay," says ah, "ah'm noan o' them
    'At calls at t'time by t'clock;"
  An bumps em dahn it corner chair,
    An gloares reyt hard at t'jock.

  "Tha nontkate witta hod thee tung,
    He'll sooin be hear I'ce think,
  Soa if thall sit an leet thee pipe,
    Ah'll fotch a sope o' drink."

  "Owd lass," says ah, "thart hey i' bone
    An rayther low i' beef;"
  "Ah barn," says shoo, "this year or two,
    'Av hed a deal o' grief.

  "Ah'm nut a wuman 'at oft speyks,
    Or sings fowk doleful sengs,
  Bud ah can tell me mind ta thee,
    Tha knaws wot things belengs.

  "Tha noaticed ah noan lewked sa staat,
    An ah can trewly say,
  Fro t'last back end o' t'year ta nah,
    A've nut been weel a day.

  "An wot we sickness, wot we grief,
    Ah'm doin tha may depend;
  It's been a weary moild an tew,
    Bud nah it gets near t'end.

  "A've bowt all t'sister 'at ah hev
    A black merina gaan;
  Fowk thinks ah'm rarely off, but, lad,
    A'm thenkful 'at ah'm baan.

  "We' t'world an ivvery thing at's in't,
    Ah'm crost to that degree,
  That mony a time i't day ah've pra'd
    To lig ma doan an dee.

  "What ah've ta tak fro t'least i't haase
    Is moar nur flesh can beear,
  It is'nt just a time be chonce
    Bud ivvery day i't year.

  "Noa livin sowl a'top o' t'earth,
    Wor tried as ah've been tried;
  There's noabdy bud the Lord an me,
    'At knaws what ah've ta bide.

  "Fro t'wind at t'stomach, t'rewmatism,
    An tengin pains it goom;
  Fro coffs an cowds, an t'spine it back,
    Ah suffer martyrdom.

  "Bud noabdy pities ma, or thinks
    Ah'm ailin owt at all;
  T'poor slave mun tug an tew we t'wark
    Wolivver shoo can crawl.

  "An Johnny's t' moast unfeelin brewt
    'At ivver ware a heead;
  He woddunt weg a hand ur fooit
    If ah wur all bud deead.

  "It mid'st o' all ah've hed ta dew,
    That roag wur nivver t'man
  Ta fotch a coil, or scar a fleg,
    Ur wesh a pot ur pan.

  "Fowk says 'ar Sal 'al sooin be wed.
    Bud t'thowt on't turns ma sick,
  'Ah'd rayther hing hur up by t'neck,
    Ur see her berrid wick.

  "An if ah new a barn o' mine,
    Wur born ta lead my life,
  Ah suddent think it wor a sin
    Ta stick hur wi' a knife.

  "Ah've ax'd ar Johnny twenty times
    Ta bring a sweep ta t' doar,
  Bud nah, afoar a'll speyk agean,
    Ah'll sit it t'haase an smoar.

  "An then, gooid grashus, what a wind
    Comes whewin throo t'doar sneck,
  Ah felt it all t'last winter like
    A whittle at my neck.

  "That sink-pipe tu gate stopt wi' muck,
    Aboon a fortnit sin;
  So ivvery aar it day wi' t'slops,
    Am treshin aht an in.

  "Aw! when ah think hah ah've been tret,
    An hah ah tew an strive,
  Ta tell thee t'honest trewth, ah'm capped
    Ta fynd mesen alive.

  "When he's been rakin aht a't neet
    At market ur a't fair;
  Sitch thowts hes coom inta me heead
    As lifted up me air.

  "Ah've thowt, ay lad, when tha cums hoam,
    Tha'll fynd ma hung by 't neck,
  Bud then ah've mebbe thowt agean
    At t' coord ud happen brek.

  "Or else ah've mutterd if i't wor'nt
    Sa dark, an cowd, an weet,
  Ah'd go ta't navvy, or ta't dam,
    An draand mesen ta neet.

  "It's greef, lad, nowt at all bud greef,
    At wastes me day be day;
  So Sattan temps ma cos ah'm wake
    Ta put mesen away."

  Towd chap heerd pairt o'what shoo sed,
    As he cam clompin in,
  An shauted in a red-fac'd rage,
    "Od rot it, hod the din."

  Then Nan began to froth an fume,
    An fiz like botteld drink,
  "Wat then, tha's enterd t'haase agean,
    Tha offald lewkin slink.

  "Tha nivver cums theas doars within
    Bud tha mun curse an sweear,
  An try ta bring ma ta me grave
    We breedin hurries hear.

  "At thee an thine sin wed we wor
    Ah've taen no end o' greef,
  An nah tha stamps ma under t'fooit,
    Tha murderin roag an theef.

  "Tha villan gimma wat ah browt,
    'At day at we wur wed,
  An nivver moar wi' one like thee
    Will ah set fooit e' bed."

  Here t' dowdy lifted tull her een
    A yard a gooid lin check,
  An sob'd, an roar'd, an rock'd hersen,
    As if her art ud breck.

  An then shoo rave reit up be't rooits
    A andful of her air,
  An fitterd like a deein duk
    An shutturd aht a't chair.

  "Aw! Jonny! run for't doctur, lad,
    Ah feel ah can tel hah."
  Sais Jonny, "Leet thee pipe agean,
    Shoo'l coom abaht enah."

  Sais ah, "Ah nivver saw a chap
    Sa eeasyful and fat,
  Tha'll suarly lend a elpin and
    Ta lift hur of a't plat."

  Bud better hed it been for him
    If he'd neer sturr'd a peg;
  My garturs! what a pawse he gat
    Fra Nan rumatic leg.

  Sooin, varry sooin, sho coom abaht
    An flang, an tare, an rave,
  E sich a way as fu cud dew
    We' one fooit i' ther grave.

  An at it went hur tongue ageean,
    That minnit shoo fan eease,
  "Tha villan tha, tha knaws thee ways
    Brings on sitch girds as theeas.

  "Aw if tha'd strike ma stiff at once,
    Ur stab ma ta me hart,
  I then cud dee content, for fowk
    Ud naw reyt what ta art.

  "Unfeelin brewt, unfeelin brewt,
    Ah neer wur weel an strong;
  There's nobbut one thing cheers ma nah,
    Ah cannut last sa long.

  "Ta stand up in a thing at's reyt,
    It isant i' me natur,
  There is at knaws I awlus wur
    A poor, soft, quiat cratur.

  "One thing ah can say if me life
    Ta neet sud end it leease;
  Ah've doin my dewty an tha knaws
    Ah awlus strave for peease.

  "Ah knaw, ah knaw at ah'm it gate,
    Tha's other oats ta thresh;
  So when ah's dun for tha ma wed
    You gooid for nowt young tresh."

  Then Nan pool'd summat aht o't drawer
    White as a summer claad;
  Ses I ta Jonny, "What's that thear?"
    Ses Jonny, "It's a shraad.

  "An t'coffin coom tu, bud ah sware
    I woddunt ha't it haase,
  So, when shoo's muled, shoo sews at that,
    As quiat as a maase."

  Then Nan lewkt at me we a lewk,
    So yonderly an sad,
  "Tha'll coom ta t'berrin?" "Yus," says ah,
    "Ah sall be varry dlad."

  "An bid the Mother," Jonny cried,
    "An ax the Uncle Ben,
  Fur all hur prayers for suddan deeath,
    Sal hev my best 'Amen.'"

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 212: Benjamin Preston, of Bradford, author of "T' Spicy Man,"
&c. Mr. Preston purposes giving a series of twelve, similar to the
above, in the dialect of Bradford Dale. Published by Abraham Holroyd,
Westgate, Bradford.]




THE BARBER OF THIRSK'S FORFEITS.


  First come, first served--Then come not late.
  And when arrived keep your sate;
  For he who from these rules shall swerve,
  Shall pay his forfeit--so observe.

  Who enters here with boots and spurs,
  Must keep his nook, for if he stirs,
  And gives with arm'd heel a kick,
  A pint he pays for every prick.

  Who rudely takes another's turn,
  By forfeit glass--may manners learn;
  Who reverentless shall swear or curse,
  Must lug seven ha'-pence from his purse.

  Who checks the barber in his tale,
  Shall pay for that a gill of yale;
  Who will, or cannot miss his hat,
  Whilst trimming pays a pint for that.

  And he who can but will not pay,
  Shall hence be sent half trimmed away;
  For will he--nill he--if in fault,
  He forfeit must in meal or malt.
  But mark the man who is in drink,
  Must the cannikin oh, never, never, clink.




THE YORKSHIRE IRISHMAN; OR, THE

ADVENTURES OF A POTATO MERCHANT.


  My father was once a great merchant,
    As any in Ireland was found,
  But, faith, he could never save a shilling,
    Tho' potatoes he sold by the pound.
  So says he to my mother one night,
    To England suppose you and I go,
  And the very next day, by moonlight,
    They took leave of the county of Slygo.
        Sing de ral, ral de ral la, fal lal de, &c.

  That the land is all cover'd with water,
    'Twixt England and Ireland, you'll own,
  And single misfortunes, they say,
    To Irishmen ne'er come alone.
  So my father, poor man! was first drown'd,
    Then shipwreck'd, in sailing from Cork,
  But my mother she got safe to land,
    And a whisky shop open'd in York.
                            Fal de ral, &c.

  Just a year after father was dead,
    One night about five i' th' morn,
  An odd accident happen'd to me,
    For 'twas then that myself was first born.
  All this I've been told by my mammy,
    And surely she'll not tell me wrong,
  But I don't remember nought of it,
    'Caze it happen'd when I was quite young.
                            Fal de ral, &c.

  On the very same day the next year,
    (For so ran the story of mother,)
  The same accident happen'd again,
    But not to me then, that were brother.
  So 'twas settled by old father Luke,
    Who dissolved all our family sins,
  As we both were born on the same day,
    That we sartainly must have been twins.
                            Fal de ral, &c.

  'Twas agreed I should not go to school,
    As learning I never should want;
  Nor would they e'en teach me to read,
    For my genius they said it would cramp.
  Now this genius of mine, where it lay,
    Do but listen awhile and you'll hear,
  'Twas in drawing,--not landscapes or pictures,
    No, mine was for drawing of beer.
                            Fal de ral, &c.

  Some with only one genius are blest,
    But I, it appears, had got two,
  For when I had drawn off some beer,
    I'd a genius for drinking it too,
  At last I was drawn up to town,
    Without in my pocket a farden,
  But since I've earn'd many a crown
    By the shop here in sweet Covvon Garden.
                                Fal de ral, &c.




WHEN AT HAME WI' DAD.


  When at hame wi' dad,
  We niver had nae fun sir,
  Which mead me sae mad,
  I swore away I'd run sir;
  I packed up cleas sae smart,
  Ribbed stocking, weastcoats pratty,
  Wi' money and leet heart,
  Tripped off te Lunnun city.
                     Fal de ral de ra.

  When I did git there,
  I geaped about quite silly,
  At all the shows te stare,
  In a spot called Piccerdilly;
  Lord sic charming seets,
  Bods i' cages thrive sir,
  Coaches, fiddles, fights,
  And crocodiles alive sir.
                  Fal de ral, &c.

  Then I did ge te see,
  The gentry in Hyde Park sir,
  When a lass pushed reedely by,
  Te whoam I did remark sir,
  "Tho' your feace be een sae fair,
  I've seen a beer mare civil."
  Then the little cleas they wear,
  God Lunnun is the devil.
                  Fal de ral, &c.

  Te 't play-house then I gaus,
  Whar I seed merry feaces,
  And in the lower rows,
  Were sarvents keeping pleaces;
  T' players I saw seun,
  They managed things quite funny,
  By gock they'd Hunny-mean,
  Afore they'd Mattrimony.
                  Fal de ral, &c.

  Now having seen all I cud,
  And passed away my time sir,
  If you think fit and good,
  I'le een give up my rhyme sir;
  And sud my ditty please,
  The popies in this garden,
  Te me t'wad be hearts-ease,
  If not I ax yer pardon.
                  Fal de ral de ra.




I'M YORKSHIRE TOO.


  By t' side of a brig, that stands over a brook,
    I was sent by times to school;
  I went wi' the stream as I studied my book,
    And was thought to be no small fool.
  I never yet bought a pig in a poke,
    For to give auld Nick his due;
  Tho' oft I've dealt wi' Yorkshire folk,
    Yet I was Yorkshire too.

  I was pretty well lik'd by each village maid,
    At races, wake or fair,
  For my father had addled a vast in trade,
    And I were his son and heir.
  And seeing that I didn't want for brass,
    Poor girls came first to woo,
  But tho' I delight in a Yorkshire lass,
    Yet I was Yorkshire too!

  To Lunnon by father I was sent,
    Genteeler manners to see;
  But fashion's so dear, I came back as I went,
    And so they made nothing o' me.
  My kind relations wou'd soon have found out
    What was best wi' my money to do:
  Says I, "My dear cousins, I thank ye for nought,
    But I'm not to be cozen'd by you!
    For I'm Yorkshire too."[213]

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 213: From _A Garland of New Songs_, printed by W. Appleton,
Darlington, 1811.]




THE SWEEPER AND THIEVES.

BY D. LEWIS.

The incident here recorded happened at a farm house, on Leeming Lane,
some years ago, and is a favourite chap-book history.


  A sweeper's lad was late o' th' neeght,
  His slap-shod shoon had leeam'd his feet;
  He call'd te see a good awd deeame,
  'At monny a time had trigg'd his weame;
  (For he wor then fahve miles fra yam.)
  He ax'd i' t' lair te let him sleep,
  An' he'd next day their chimlers sweep.
  They supper'd him wi' country fare,
  Then show'd him tul his hooal i' t' lair.
  He crept intul his streeahy bed,
  His pooak o' seeat beneath his heead;
  He wor content, nur car'd a pin,
  An' his good friend then lock'd him in.
  The lair frae t' hoose a distance stood,
  Between 'em grew a lahtle wood.
  Aboot midneeght, or nearer moorn,
  Twea thieves brack in te steeal their coorn;
  Hevin a leeght i' t' lantern dark,
  Seean they te winder fell te wark;
  An' wishing they'd a lad te fill,
  Young brush, (whea yet had ligg'd quite still,)
  Thinkin' 'at t' men belang'd te t' hoose,
  An' that he noo mud be o' use,
  Jump'd doon directly on te t' fleear,
  An' t' thieves beeath ran oot at deear;
  Nur stopt at owt nur thin nur thick,
  Fully convinc'd it wor awd Nick.
  The sweeper lad then ran reeght seean
  Te t' hoose, an' tell'd 'em what wor deean:
  Maister an' men then quickly raise,
  An' ran te t' lair wi' hawf ther cleeas.
  Twea horses, secks, an' leeght they fand,
  Which had been left by t' thievish band;
  These round i' t' neybourheead they cried,
  Bud nut an awner e'er applied;
  For neean durst horses awn nur secks,
  They wor seea freeghten'd o' ther necks.
  They seld the horses, an' of course,
  Put awf o' the brass i' sooty's purse;
  Desiring when he com that way,
  He'd awlus them a visit pay,
  When harty welcome he sud have
  Because he did ther barley save.
  Brush chink'd the guineas in his hand,
  An' oft te leeak at 'em did stand,
  As heeame he wistlin' teak his way;
  Blessin' t' awd deeame wha let him stay,
  An' sleep i' t' lair, when, late o' t' neeght,
  His slap-shod shoon had leeam'd his feet.




HOWELL WOOD;[214] OR, THE RABY HUNT, IN YORKSHIRE,

FEBRUARY, 1803.


  To the tune of "_Ballynamonaora_."

  "Let those ride hard, who never rode before,
  And those who always rode, now ride the more."

    Whilst passing o'er Barnsdale,[215] I happen'd to spy,
    A fox stealing on and the hounds in full cry;
    They are DARLINGTON'S sure, for his voice I well know,
    Crying forward--hark forward; from Skelbrook[216] below.

                     With my Ballynamonaora,
                     The hounds of old Raby for me.

  See Binchester leads them, whose speed seldom fails,
  And now let us see who can tread on their tails;
  For, like pigeons in flight, the best hunter would blow,
  Should his master attempt to ride over them now.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  From HOWELL WOOD come--they to STAPLETON[217] go,
  What confusion I see, in the valley below;
  My friends in _black collars_,[218] nearly beat out of sight,
  And BADSWORTH'S old heroes in sorrowful plight.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  'Tis hard to describe all the frolic and fun,
  Which, of course, must ensue, in this capital run;
  But I quote the old proverb, howe'er trite and lame,
  That--"_The looker on sees most by half of the game_."
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Then first in the burst, see dashing away,
  Taking all on his stroke, on RALPHO the grey;
  With _persuaders_ in flank, comes DARLINGTON'S peer,[219]
  With his chin sticking out, and his cap on one ear.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Never heeding a tumble, a scratch, or a fall,
  Laying close in his quarter, see SCOTT of WOODHALL;[220]
  And mind how he cheers them, with "Hark to the cry!"
  Whilst on him the peer keeps a _pretty sharp eye_.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  And next him on MORGAN, all rattle and talk,
  Cramming over the fences, comes wild MARTIN HAWKE,[221]
  But his neck he must break, surely sooner or late,
  As he'd rather _ride over_ than _open_ a gate.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Then there's dashing FRANK BOYNTON, who rides thorough breds,
  Their carcases nearly as small as their heads:
  But he rides so d----d hard that it makes my heart ache,
  For fear his long legs should be left on a stake.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Behold HARRY MELLISH,[222] as wild as the wind,
  On LANCASTER mounted, leaving numbers behind;
  But lately return'd from democrat France,
  Where forgetting to bet--he's been learning to dance.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  That eagle-ey'd sportsman, CHARLES BRANDLING, behold,
  Laying in a snug place, which needs scarcely be told;
  But from riding so hard, my friend CHARLEY forbear,
  For fear you should tire you _thirty pound mare_!
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  And close at his heels, see BOB LASCELLES advance,
  Dress'd as gay for the field, as if leading the dance,
  Resolv'd to ride hard, nor be counted the last,
  Pretty sure of the speed of his fav'rite OUTCAST.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Next mounted on PANCAKE, see yonder comes LEN,[223]
  A sportsman, I'm sure, well deserving my pen;
  He looks in high glee, and enjoying the fun,
  Tho' truly I fear that his _cake's over done_.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  On METHODIST perched, in a very good station,
  FRANK BARLOW behold, that firm prop of the nation,
  But nothing could greater offend the good soul,
  Than to _Coventry sent_ from the chase and the bowl.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Then those two little fellows, as light as a feather,
  CHARLES PARKER and CLOWES[224] come racing together,
  And riding behind them, see OLIVER DICK,[225]
  With SLAP-DASH half blown, looking sharp for a nick.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  On EBONY mounted, behold my LORD BARNARD,[226]
  To live near the pack, now oblig'd is to strain hard;
  But mount my friend BARNY, on something that's quick,
  I warrant, my lads, he would show you a trick.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Then BLAND[227] and TOM GASCOIGNE,[228] I spy in the van,
  Riding hard as two devils, at catch as catch can,
  But racing along, to try which can get first,
  Already, I see, both _their_ horses are burst.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Then smack at a yawner falls my friend BILLY CLOUGH,[229]
  He gets up, stares around him, faith! silly enough;
  While PILKINGTON[230] near him, cries "Pr'ythee get bled."
  "Oh no, never mind, Sir, I fell on my head."
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  But where's that hard rider, my friend COL. BELL?[231]
  At the first setting off from the cover he fell;
  But I see the old crop, thus the whole chase will carry,
  In respectable style, the good-temper'd HARRY.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  With very small feet, sticking fast in the mud,
  FRANK HAWKSWORTH[232] I see, on his neat bit of blood;
  But, pull up, my friend, say you've lost a _fore shoe_,
  Else _bleeding_, I fear, must be shortly for you.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  To keep their nags fresh for the end of the day,
  SIR EDWARD[233] and LASCELLES just canter away;
  Not enjoying the pace our Raby hounds go,
  But preferring the maxim of "_certain and slow_."
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  At the top of his speed, sadly beat and forlorn,
  Behold CAPT. HORTON is steering for BALN;
  For accustom'd at sea, both to _shift_ and to _tack_,
  He hopes by _manoeuv'ring_ to gain the fleet pack.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  The two LEES,[234] HARVEY HAWKE,[235] FRANK SOTH'RON,[236] and all,
  Are skirting away for STAPLETON HALL;
  Whilst far in the rear, behold ALVERLEY COOKE,[237]
  Endeav'ring to scramble o'er HAMPOLE'S wide brook.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Far aloof to the right, and op'ning a gate,
  There's a sportsman by system, who never rides straight;
  But why, my good GODFREY,[238] thus far will you roam,
  When a pack of fine beagles hunt close to your home?
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Safe o'er the brook--but where's CAPTAIN DANSER?[239]
  Oh! he's stopping to catch SIR ROWLAND WINN'S prancer;
  But what is the use of that, my friend WINN,[240]
  If on foot you attempt it, you'll _sure_ tumble in.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  On his chesnut nag mounted, and heaving in flank,
  At a very great distance, behold BACON FRANK;[241]
  So true's the old maxim, we even now find,
  That, "_justice will always come limping behind_."
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  See STARKEY and HOPWOOD, so full of their jokes,
  From BRAMHAM MOOR come, to be quizzing the folks;
  And when they return the whole chase they'll explain,
  Tho' they saw little of it--to crony FOX LANE.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Lost, spavin'd, and wind-gall'd, but showing some blood,
  For from COXCOMB'S poor shoulders it streams in a flood;
  Behold Mr. HODGSON,[242] how he fumes and he frets,
  While his black lays entangled in cursed sheep nets.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  If his name I pass'd over, I fear he would cavil,
  I just wish to say that I _saw_ Mr. SAVILLE;
  And with very long coat on, (a friend to his tailor)
  With some more WAKEFIELD heroes, behold Mr. NAYLOR.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  A large posse see in the valley below,
  Who serve very well for to make up a show;
  But broad as the brook is, it made many stop,
  It's not ev'ry man's luck for to get to the top.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  JOHNNY DALTON[243] so sure at Went made a slip,
  His nag tumbl'd in and he cry'd for his whip;
  His groom coming up found his master so cross,
  D----n your fine whip, what's become of the horse?
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Now all having pass'd, I'll to FERRYBRIDGE go,[244]
  Each event of the day at the club I shall know;
  Where bright bumpers of claret enliven the night,
  And chase far away hated envy, and spite.
                              Chorus. With my, &c.

  Then forgive me, my friends, if you think me severe,
  'Tis but meant as a joke, not intended to sneer;
  Come I'll give you a toast, in a bumper of wine,
  Here's success to this club, and to sport so divine.
                  And the hounds of old Raby for me.[245]

FOOTNOTES:

[Footnote 214: Howell Wood is situated about ten miles westward from
Doncaster. Amongst the possessions of the priory of St. Oswald at Nostel
that passed to Dr. Leigh, the original grantee from the crown, on the
22nd March, 31 H. viii., 1540, were a capital messuage called Holewell
or Hovel hall, in the parish of Thurnscoe, with a _wood_ of 160 acres.
This wood is now the property of William Aldam, esq., of Frickley.]

[Footnote 215: The district called Barnsdale begins at a short distance
northwards of Robin Hood's well. It is situated about midway between
Doncaster and Ferrybridge, or Doncaster and Pontefract, and is
celebrated for having been one of the favourite haunts of the "bold
Robin Hood." See p. 35, _ante_.]

[Footnote 216: Skelbrook, about seven miles from Doncaster, a handsome
gentleman's residence, was then the property of H. Perryn Brown, esq.,
and occupied by Dawson Humble, esq. It passed to the family of John Pate
Nevile, esq., formerly of Badsworth, in which it remains, and is now the
seat of Mrs. Nevile. Situated in the vicinity of Barnsdale, and close to
the well of Robin Hood, there seemed to be kept up a lingering remnant
of ancient forestry in the maintenance here, for many years, of a small
park of deer, but which has been lately discontinued. Dr. Miller, in his
"Hist. of Doncaster," p. 343, states that this park was famous for the
fine venison it produced.]

[Footnote 217: Stapleton, in the parish of Darrington, is about five or
six miles from Skelbrook, northwards, on the right-hand side of the
Great North Road. The owner at that time was Ellis Hodgson, esq.
(mentioned afterwards). It was afterwards the property of the Hon. Ed.
R. Petre, and is now that of J. H. Barton, esq.]

[Footnote 218: The members of the Raby Hunt wear black velvet collars
with a gold fox thereon, _courant_, to their scarlet coats.]

[Footnote 219: William Henry Vane, 3rd earl of Darlington, afterwards
1st marquess, and duke of Cleveland, K. G. &c. &c., of Raby Castle, co.
Durham, born 27 July, 1766. His grace, when earl of Darlington, for
several years occupied Bilham house, near Doncaster, as a sporting seat,
and hunted that part of the country. He died 5 Feb. 1842.]

[Footnote 220: Joseph Scott, esq., for many years resident at Badsworth
hall.]

[Footnote 221: The Hon. Martin Bladen Edward Hawke, 2nd son of Martin
Bladen, 2nd lord Hawke; born 1 April, 1777.]

[Footnote 222: Henry Francis Mellish, esq., of Blythe hall, Notts; died
24 July, 1817.]

[Footnote 223: Leonard Walbanke Childers, esq., of Doncaster, died 24
Jany. 1826, aged 57.]

[Footnote 224: Samuel Clowes, esq., lived at Warmsworth, and Sprotbrough
hall.]

[Footnote 225: Richard Oliver, esq., of Darrington hall.]

[Footnote 226: Henry Vane, viscount Barnard, eldest son of the above
earl of Darlington, and the present duke of Cleveland.]

[Footnote 227: Thomas Davison Bland, esq., of Kippax.]

[Footnote 228: Thomas Gascoigne, esq., of Parlington.]

[Footnote 229: Wm. Clough, esq., of Oxton, near Tadcaster.]

[Footnote 230: Of Chevet, probably.]

[Footnote 231: Robert Bell, of Newcastle, married Anne Mildreda, d. of
C. W. Childers, esq., of Cantley.]

[Footnote 232: Francis Hawksworth, esq., of Barnbro' Grange.]

[Footnote 233: Sir Edward Dodworth, bart., of Newland.]

[Footnote 234: Wm. Lee, esq., of Grove, near Pontefract, many years
treasurer of the West Riding, (father of R. T. Lee, esq., now of Grove,)
and his brother James Lee, esq., of Carlton, afterwards of West Retford
house, Notts.]

[Footnote 235: The Hon. Edward Harvey Hawke, afterwards the 3rd lord
Hawke, born 3 May, 1774.]

[Footnote 236: Frank Sotheron, afterwards admiral, of Darrington, and
Kirklington, Notts.]

[Footnote 237: Brian Wm. Darwin Cooke, esq., of Alverley, near
Doncaster; died 26 April, 1823.]

[Footnote 238: Probably Godfrey Wentworth Wentworth, esq., of Wolley,
high sheriff, 1796; died Sept. 14, 1834.]

[Footnote 239: William Danser, Lt. Col. Royal Regt., who, when captain
4th Grenadiers, led the landing in Egypt; died at Doncaster, 19th March,
1812, aged 49.]

[Footnote 240: Of Nostell.]

[Footnote 241: Bacon Frank, esq., of Campsall, an active justice of the
peace, and for many years chairman of the quarter sessions. High sheriff
1777; died 4 April, 1812, aged 73.]

[Footnote 242: Ellis Hodgson, esq., of Stapleton, before alluded to.]

[Footnote 243: Probably of Slenningford, near Ripon.]

[Footnote 244: Ferrybridge, fifteen miles from Doncaster, on the Great
North Road, once celebrated for its excellent inns--the Angel and the
Swan.]

[Footnote 245: Kindly favoured by Charles Jackson, esq., of Doncaster.]




THE COLLINGHAM GHOST.


  I'll tell ye aboot the Collingham ghost,
    An' a rare aud ghost was he;
  For he cud laff, an' he cud talk,
    An' run, an' jump, an' flee.

  He went aboot hither an' thither,
    An' freeten'd sum out o' thir wits,
  He freeten'd the parson as weel as the clark,
    An' lots beside them into fits.

  The poor aud man wha teak the towl
    At Collingham bar for monny a year,
  He dursn't cum out to opp'n his yat
    For fear the ghost sud be near.

  He teak to his bed an' there he laid,
    For monny a neet an' day;
  His yat was aulas wide opp'n thrown,
    An' nean ivver stopp't to pay.

  And Jerry wha kept the public house,
    An' sell'd gud yal to all,
  Curs'd the ghost wi' hearty gud will,
    For neabody stopp'd to call.

  It made sike a noise all round aboot,
    That folks com far to see;
  Sum sed it was a dreadful thing,
    An' sum sed it was a lee.

  Gamkeepers com wi' dogs an' guns,
    Thinking it was some comical beast;
  An' they wad aither kill him or catch him,
    Or drive him awa at least.

  Sea into Lady wood right they went
    Yah beautiful meenleet neet;
  A lot o' great men an' a lot o' ruff dogs,
    Enew a poor ghost to eat.

  They watid lang--the ghost didn't come,
    They began to laff an' rail,--
  "If he cum oot ov hiz den," says yan,
    "We'll clap a bit o' saut ov hiz tail."

  "Nay he knoos better then turn oot,
    When we are here to watch him,
  He'd git a bullit through his lug,
    Or Mungo there wad catch him."

  When close to their heads wi' a terrible clatter
    The ghost went wherrin up,
  An' ower the woods he lafft an' shoutid,
    "Bobo, bobo! who whoop, who whoop!"

  The gamkeepers all tummled doon,
    Their hair thrast off their hat,
  They gaped an' grean'd an' roll'd aboot,
    An' their hearts went pit-a-pat.

  Thir feaces were white as onny clout,
    An' they sed nivver a word,
  They cudn't tell what the ghost was like,
    Whether 'twas a beast or a bird.

  They stay'd nea langer i' th' wood that neet,
    Poor men were nivver dafter,
  They ran awa hame as fast as they cud,
    An' thir dogs ran yelping after.

  The parson then, a larned man,
    Sed he wad conjur the ghost;
  He was sure it was nea wandrin beast,
    But a spirit that was lost.

  All languages this parson knew
    That onny man can chat in,
  The Ebrew, Greek, an' Irish too,
    As weel as Dutch an' Latin.

  O! he cud talk an' read an' preach,
    Few men knew mair or better,
  An' nearly all the bukes he read,
    Wer printed in black letter.

  He read a neet, he read a day,
    To mak him fit for his wark,
  An' when he thowt he was quite up,
    He sent for the awd clark.

  The clark was quickly by his side,
    He took but little fettlin,
  An' awa they went wi' right gud will
    To gie the ghost a settlin.

  Aye off they set wi' all thir might,
    Nor stoppt at thin or thick,
  The parson wi' his sark an' buke,
    The clark wi' a thick stick.

  At last by t' side o' th' bank they stoppt
    Where Wharfe runs murmrin clear,
  A beautiful river breet an' fine,
    As onny in wide Yorkshire.

  The parson then began to read,
    An' read full loud an' lang,
  The rabbits they ran in an' oot,
    An' wonder'd what was rang.

  The ghost was listnin in a hole,
    An' oot he bang'd at last,
  The fluttrin o' his mighty wings,
    Was like a whirlwind blast.

  He lafft an' shooted as he flew
    Until the wild woods rang;
  His who-who-whoop was nivver heard
    Sea lood an' clear, an' strang.

  The parson he fell backwards ower
    Into a bush o' whins,
  An' lost his buke, an' rave his sark,
    An' prickt his hans an' shins.

  The clark he tried to run awa
    But tumm'ld ower his stick,
  An' there he made a nasty smell
    While he did yell an' fick.

  An' lots o' pranks this ghost he play'd
    That here I dar'nt tell,
  For if I did folks wad declare
    I was as ill as his-sel.

  For eighteen[246] months an' mair he stay'd,
    An' just did as he thowt;
  For lord nor duke, parson nor clark,
    He fear'd, nor cared nowt.

  Efter that time he went awa,
    Just when it pleas'd his-sel;
  But what he was, or whar he com fra
    Nea mortal man can tell.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 246: Commencing in the year 1836.]




THE TWEA THRESHERS.

A story of two rustics, and the history of their several mistakes during
a holiday which they took, in 1842, to go to Scarborough to see the
Florentine Venus, then being exhibited in that town.


  'Twas on a fiahne cleer sunny day,
    Aboot the end o' summer,
  When all the goa was Scarbro' spo,
    Between the Tees an Hummer.

  Coaches grained 'neath top heavy leeads,
    Gigs, carriages an sike like,
  Skew'd dust like fun fra' all the rooads,
    At' end at Scarbro' tonpike.

  Lauk! what a dust there was kick'd up
    Like deed what blustrin storance,
  A waint queer seeght was seen that da,
    Some waxwark thing fra Florence.

  Jerry an Jack, twea treshers bold,
    Wer bangin 'oot and barley,
  A dusty trade, hard by the rooad
    Sweatin an broilin rarly.

  "Dod dang," says Jack, "yau knocks an delves,
    Digs, plews, sows, maws, an what for?
  Pately at yau may live yau's sens,
    Bud mare to keep up that, Jer."

  He pointed ti twea carriage leead
    'O fashionable people;
  Wea seem'd to knoo the arts 'o ease,
    Sat couple feeacing couple.

  "Why can't we hev a bit 'o spree,
    As weel as uther folks, Jer?"
  "I deean't see why," quoth Jer, "dang me!
    If ahle ageean strike strooak, ser.

  "Afoor I'v seen that Florance thing,
    It nobbut costs a shillin;
  Besides I lang ti hev a spree,
    An get a thorough swillin."

  "Bonni!" says Jack, "bonni, my lad,
    I like the risolution;
  Let's hev thi hand, thi scheeam's weel plan'd,
    We'll het i' execution."

  Seea Jack and Jer shack'd hands and showd
    'At peasant cud wi peasant,
  Like prince wi prince, an lord wi lord,
    Laugh loud, feel pleased, luke pleasant.

  Seea yam tha went, wesh'd, scrub'd, an brush'd,
    An sware tha wad hev rare spooat;
  An eeach put on his bran new suit,
    New breeches, cooat, an waiscooat.

  An off tha went: "God speed ya weel!"
    Cried Jinny, that was Jack's wife;
  "An i' yer harts his love reveeal,"
    Cried Fan, the soul 'o Jer's life.

  "I wop yoo'll hev a pleasant da."
    "I wop you will," said Jenny:
  "I wop we sal," said Jack, "hurra!"
    "I wop we sal," said Jerry.

  An tha wer gone, lauk hoo tha preached,
    An laugh'd all't way tha though;
  Far on afoor their voices reach'd,
    Ther mirth was getin vent so.

  The wavy fiels 'o yallow wheat,
    Spread wide i' view ther treasure;
  The side swung wots, an bearded John,
    'At fills the tankard measure,

  Did sweetly vie wi promises
    Zi fill oor barns wi plenty:
  "Thank God," says Jack, "these are his gifts,
    Ye fields 'twas him at sent ye."

  Plenty thronged like an empress sat
    Upon the broo 'o Cayton;
  Wea laughed an made the hills ti smile
    For miles round bonny Ayton.




DOLLY'S GAON; OR, THE EFFECTS OF PRIDE.[247]


  The neighbours all remember weel
    Once Dolly bought a gaon;
  A painted lin, the grandest thing;
    Ther but one piece ith taon.

  The boy ith shop he teld her soa;
    A merry joaking lad:
  He said it wor t' first gaon o't piece
    That ony one had had:--

  And if shoo'd come when it wor made,
    And let him see it on,
  A handkerchy he'd give to her,
    If he're a living man.

  The gaon wor made, to 'th church shoo went;
    But what gave most delight,
  Shoo heeard foulks whisper as shoo past,
    I never so the like!

  But when shoo coom at Rubin's cot,
    A hut that stood o'th moor,
  Old Rubin sat, and Grace his wife,
    Both smooking at the door.

  "Good morning, Dolly," old Grace said,
    "I wonder'd wo't could be."
  Surprised shoo stud, her hands both up,
    "What mun I live to see!"

  "Is tat thy choice," old Rubin said,--
    "Tha beots old Judy Gazer,
  Shoo'd fifty gaons, but nooan like that,--
    I'gy it is a blazer!"

  Gay Dolly laugh'd, old Rubin said--
    "Come in and sit te daon;"
  But Dolly tript along the green,
    Delighted with her gaon.

  The church shoo enter'd, 'twor begun,
    The best time to be seen;
  Some sat and star'd, and some stood up,
    As if shoo'd been the queen.

  This confirm'd Dolly in her choice;
    Her gaon wurt first in stile:
  The priest, and clark, and all did stare,
    And some, shoo thought, did smile.

  This printed gaon had broad green leaves,
    With branches thick and tall;
  Red burds and yollow, ducks and geese,
    The huntsman, haonds and all.

  Thus Dolly sat, like Sheba's queen,
    The grandest in the place;
  A sidelong glance sometimes shoo cast
    But did not turn her face.

  Her prayer-book shoo seem'd to read,
    As other people do;
  But her devotion was her dress,
    Her gaon wor spanking new.

  The church did loase, and still they star'd;
    Some laugh'd and made a stur:
  The childer too came running raond,
    One pointing said, "That's hur."

  "Ah! what a gaon!" shoo heeard 'em say,
    "Wi yollow burds and red:
  It's just sich stuff as gentle fooak
    Makes curtains for their bed."

  This confused Dolly all at once,
    Shoo knew not where shoo'er baon;
  For fooaks shoo met, they laugh'd and said--
    "Haa like ye yo'r new gaon?"

  But Dolly shoo would speyk to nooan;
    To meet fouk shoo were feard:
  For some took hold o' Dolly's gaon,
    And ast what twor a yeord.

  Shoo call'd to see old Betty Hay,
    While chapel fouk went past;
  As shoo went in shoo heeard 'em say,
    "Shoo's getten here at last."

  This wor a spice shop, where t' lads met;
    A merry hoil it ware:
  Lads making fun o' all they could,
    And Dolly gat her share.

  The haaos wor fill'd, but all gave place;
    "Come, Dolly, sit ye daon:"
  When hoaf a dozen lads cried aaot--
    "That is a bonny gaon!"

  "Yo've bet'em, Dolly, all to day;
    Yo'r gaon is first in stile:
  It's been admir'd by all ith church,
    Old priest, we saw him smile.

  "Yo've vext old Mrs. Smith to day;
    Her dress is nout like this:
  Shoo knows it too, they all do say,
    And's taen it quite amiss.

  "When t' childer laugh'd at yo'r new gaon,
    Shoo turn'd her face toth wal;
  When church did loase, shoo went back way,
    So as to miss 'em all."

  Some thought this gaon could not be bought
    At Halifax at all:
  It wor a London print, they thought;
    'T piece sud be sent for--all.

  A what a profit Dolly'd got!
    Shoo'd sell it in a crack;
  "This dress beoats all, come, lads, and see
    A hunt o' Dolly's back!"

  The noise wor great, the laugh wor loud;
    Lads shaoting hard a-way:
  Poor Dolly rag'd, some said shoo swore,
    At last we heeard her say--

  "Gooid God!" said Dolly, stamping mad,
    "Whatever sall I hear?
  I'm t' laughing stock for all, egad,
    I'm war nor ever here."

  Up Dolly jumps--this is a hoil;
    Ol gooa, it dos'n't meon:
  Shoo heeard t' lads say oth aaotside door--
    "Shoo's coming aaot ageon."

  Lads pull'd her daon, but still shoo'd goa;
    And running straight at door:
  Chears and tables, spice and nuts
    Shoo tumbled on toth floor.

  "What will yo do," old Betty said,
    When chears and tables crash'd;
  "Me spice and apples daon oth floor,
    And cumfit glass is smash'd."

  Lads ran at apples, spice and nuts,
    All sprawling daon o'th floor;
  Poor Dolly said, "If I get aaot,
    Yol catch me here no moore."

  "Naa, flint-faced Tom," old Betty said,
    "There's not a war ith taon;"
  Tha held her fast, then late her slip,
    Tha new shoo'd nock stuff daon.

  "Aye, tha my laugh, tha brazen'd thing,
    But will ta mak it up;
  There is not hoaf oth stuff just naa
    I had before ith shop.

  "Such sturs as these I hate to see;"--
    Tom said he ne'er begunt;
  "Old tale ageon, its none o'me,
    It's olas nubdy's dunt.

  "There's winkin Will, and Jack ith oil,
    Thes not two war ith shop;
  I saw yo pushing lasses daon,
    Then picking lads oth top.

  "There's Dolly here, theyn tore her cap;
    And t' screed wor London lace;
  Shoe blacking temd o'hur new gaon,
    And spotted black her face.

  "Me chears theyn mash'd, me stoils theyn smash'd,
    And crack'd t' new table top;
  My apple pooak theyn taen away,
    An put puttates ith spot.

  "Sich sturs wud ruin ony man;
    Whate'er I says no use:
  There's three or four oth back oth door,
    Eighting my spenisjuce.

  "I'll fotch a warrant, if I live;
    I'll transpoort ten to-morn:
  Reit ovver sea I'll send yo all,
    As sure as 'ere yor born.

  "Nan, ta me cap toth frilling shop,
    Them get it up best way;
  Ol be at justices at morn,
    Be it be breyk o' day.

  "I'll not go there a daggletail,
    Like mucky onion Ann;
  I'll tell a tale, (yol seet ith news,)
    As weel as ony man."

  Ther scores o' people craaded raond,
    Twor like a village fair:
  When shoo went aaot ther sich a noise,
    As if they'd rais'd a hare.

  Sly Billy took her by the arm;
    "Come, Dolly, stick to me:"
  But Dolly struck him plump oth face;
    "I'll nooan be fooil'd by thee."

  His nose did bleed, the people laugh'd,
    "Reyt, thump him," they did cry;
  But Billy 'er fain to run away,
    His bloody nose to dry.

  Another scene gave Dolly pain:
    It struck her like a blast;
  Her old sweetheart wi bonny Jane,
    Stud laaghing as shoo past.

  This wor too much, the tears did flow,
    Her trubbled brest did beat;
  When love for love expects a smile,
    A scornful taunt did meet.

  "Thal wed her naa," Jane laughing said;
    "Shoo beots fine fouk ith taon;
  Shoo's like a walking cortan'd bed;
    I wish I'd sich a gaon."

  This Dolly heeard, but on shoo mov'd;
    Sad, mourning, all furlorn:
  "I wor in different trim, God knows,
    When I coom on at morn."

  I must be dreaming, Dolly thought;
    But to be sure shoo put
  Hur hands both up to touch her een,
    To feel if they wor shut.

  "This gaon, I'll burn it if I live,
    I'll burn it every bit;
  For, warst of all, where'er e go,
    Thel say I'm short o' wit."

  Then Dolly went at sich a speed,
    Shoo never went before;
  When shoo gat home shoo doft her gaon,
    Declar'd shoo'd dont no more.


          THE MORAL.

  O what a change we undergo
    By fate's unfriendly touch;
  When we're asham'd and laugh'd at too,
    For what we've priz'd so much.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 247: By a Native Genius. Printed by Crabtree and son,
Cheapside, Halifax. To which is added, "Rose and Dolly," &c.]




THE WIDOW'S LAMENT.

This ballad is founded on an event which took place in the latter part
of the year 1848. A gamekeeper of the earl of Ripon went out one night
about his usual business, and was found next morning, near one of the
plantations on Hutton Moor, shot dead. A notorious poacher, who was seen
in the neighbourhood on the day of the murder, was apprehended and tried
at York assizes, but acquitted for want of evidence; he subsequently
emigrated to America, where he died, and is said to have confessed that
he was the murderer.


  The cheerless day is closing fast,
    The angry night-wind howls around,
  And hurried by the sweeping blast,
    Cold sleet and snow drive o'er the ground.

  Nought pleasing can the scene impart,
    Far as the weary eye can scan;
  But colder far the widow's heart,--
    The widow of the murdered man.

  The scene is o'er--the grave has closed
    Above the form she loved the best;
  The heart where all her trust reposed
    Was driven to untimely rest.

  Amid her children weeping round,
    She stands an image of despair,
  Clasping her arms her infant round,--
    Yet from her eye there falls no tear;

  Hers is a keener, deeper woe,
    A more intense and heavy grief,
  Than those whence tears in torrents flow,
    And give the burdened heart relief.

  "Well may ye weep," at length she cried,
    "Poor orphans to a father's care,
  By villain's shot your father died,
    And left us hopeless, friendless here.

  "Why on my heart such sudden fear
    Came icy cold I cannot tell;
  When loud the shot pealed on mine ear,
    I thought by it my husband fell.

  "He was I fear too rashly brave!
    His heart was bold tho' warm and kind,
  But now it moulders in the grave,
    And we are helpless left behind.

  "In health and hope he left his home,
    And promised early to return,
  For him I spread my choicest store,
    And brighter made the fire to burn.

  "For him, alas! I looked in vain,
    The night closed in dark, drear, and wild,
  I sigh'd and wept, then looked again,
    Then looked upon my sleeping child.

  "And oh! that night of dreadful grief,
    Of fear, uncertainty, and sorrow,
  What could I think? where seek relief?
    I hoped--yet feared the coming morrow.

  "I thought that night would ne'er be done,
    Each minute seemed a dreary day;
  My heart before was ne'er cast down,
    As then it drooped at his delay.

  "Each sound I heard I thought him come,
    And eager looked--but looked in vain;
  That dreary night he was from home,
    And there he never came again.

  "The morning told the fatal truth,
    My hapless heart presaged my lot,
  The loved companion of my youth,
    Was murdered by a villain's shot.

  "Oh! murderous man, what hast thou done?
    Reflect upon thy awful crime!
  What peace of mind to thee can come,
    Oh wretch repent while thou hast time!

  "Oh! I could curse thee in my grief!
    Thou murderer of my peace and joy;
  But I will not--'twere small relief,
    Tho' justice should thy life destroy.

  "'Twould not recall to life again
    The man I loved in early youth:
  Ah me! ah me! now all in vain
    His kindness, my confiding truth.

  "In thy dark cell alone to pine
    From every consolation free;
  I'd rather bear my lot than thine,
    I'd rather be myself than thee!

  "Will not before thy startled eye
    Thy murdered victim ever seem?
  Canst thou in slumber think to lie,
    And not behold him in thy dream?

  "For me, alas! what shall I do?
    My children soon must cry for bread,
  And he, the husband, father true,
    Who was our all, is murdered.

  "Deep in his grave, oh! I could rest,
    There would my cares and sorrows cease;
  With him I should--I should be blest!
    O with him I should be at peace!

  "Come death relieve me of my woe!
    Come bid my sleepless eyelids close!
  O gladly to his grave I'd go,
    And share with him his cold repose!

  "Why dost thou smile? my darling child!
    Thy heavy loss thou dost not know!
  Thy mother's grief is frantic, wild,
    For oh thy father moulders low!

  "No more will he with kindly care,
    Caress thee fondly in his arms;
  His loving kiss thou canst not share,
    Nor lisp to him thy vain alarms.

  "Forgive me, God! I wished to die,
    When thou my babe so sweetly smiled;--
  For thee to live in hope I'll try,
    My comfort left, my darling child!"

  As conscious of its parent's woe,
    The artless innocent upsprung,
  Its arms around her neck to throw,
    While to her lips its kisses clung.

  Then love dissolved the mother's grief,
    What mother can desert her child?
  A flood of tears now brought relief,
    And hope again (though faintly) smiled.




ALICE HAWTHORN.[248]


  Come all ye gay sportsmen who join in the sport,
  And oft to the race-course with pleasure resort,
  Come listen to me while of Alice I sing,
  Who bids fair to rival the famous Bees Wing.


CHORUS.

     To swift Alice Hawthorn, then fill up the glass, And give her a
     bumper,--the first in the race.

  Her sire was famous, Muley Moloch his name,
  Her dame was Rebecca, a mare of great fame,
  The pride of the turf, and the crack of the day,
  They carried the cups and the prizes away.

  She beat them at Richmond in the year forty-two,
  Also at Northallerton swiftly she flew,
  As if she was going on the wings of the wind,
  And leaving the jockies to whip up behind.

  At Richmond in forty-three, all of them tried,
  To beat Alice Hawthorn, but vainly they vied,
  'Twas glorious to see how the favourite did run,
  And the Victoria Plate like a gallant she won.

  At Liverpool races she beat every horse,
  And at York too she triumphed, the pride of the course,
  And when Alice Hawthorn to Doncaster came,
  The cup was her prize, and they all gave her fame.

  The Ascot Heath sporters prepared her a prize,
  And she won it most nobly, and pleased all their eyes,
  She won at Newcastle, and to crown all up,
  She gallantly carried away Goodwood cup.

  The year forty-four is the height of her fame,
  Her trainer, Bob Hesseltine, joys in her name,
  Her master has reaped a good harvest this year,
  And swift Alice Hawthorn to Salvin[249] is dear.

  At York the Queen's Hundred she then bore away,
  And proved herself fairly the crack of the day,
  The Yorkers stood gaping and praising the mare,
  And Alice! brave Alice! rung loud in the air.

  At Lewes she won the Queen's Plate in grand style,
  And her rider gazed on the old mare with a smile,
  Then Doncaster crown'd her the queen of the course,
  By winning three prizes and never a loss.

  And now to conclude, you'll allow me to say,
  At Richmond she carried the gold cup away,
  So here's to Sim. Templeman, drink to the man,
  And beat him on Alice ye jocks if ye can.

FOOTNOTES:

[Footnote 248: From a broadside _penes me_, written by John Tate, "the
Pocklington Poet," and printed by J. Forth, Pocklington.]

[Footnote 249: Mr. Salvin purchased her of Mr. Plummer; and in another
song, after enumerating "the noble prizes she won, with courage bold,"
concludes:--

  "Unto my song I'll make an end, until I write again,
  Success to Mr. Hesseltine her noble trainer's name,
  Likewise to Mr. Plummer, who she often makes to smile,
  And may they every coming year in racing annals shine."
]




TOMMY THUMB.


  I'ze a poor country lad, as you see by my dress,
  That I'ze Yorkshire, mayhap, you may pratty well guess;
  My name's Zekiel Homespun, you all know me now,
  It is not the first time I have here made my bow.
                                 Tol lol de roll, &c.

  To London I com'd, upon bus'ness, d'ye see,
  But contriv'd to make pleasure and bus'ness agree;
  For when I gets back wi' our chaps on the green,
  They'll be sure to be asking me what I ha' seen.

  Now having in town but a short time to stay,
  Thinks I, while the sunshines, I'd better make hay;
  So I ask'd what the play were? they told me, by gum,
  'Twas a very fine tragedy, call'd Tommy Thumb.

  In Yorkshire I'd oft heard our knowing ones say,
  That a very good moral was learn'd from a play,
  And that tragedy boasted of language so fine,
  So I thought that, as how, it might help me wi' mine.

  Well, the curtain drew up, and the first to appear,
  Were two gentlemen drest, to be sure, mortal queer;
  Says one, "To the king, this petition I'll show,"
  Then the other to him answered, "Do, Doodle, do."

  In the next scene were the king and the queen on their throne,
  To whom the petition was presently shown;
  But king Arthur from Doodle indignantly shrunk,
  "For," says he, "'tis our pleasure this day to get drunk."

  So thinks I to myself, an' that's what you're about,
  There's no business for me, sure, to see the play out;
  To my own native parts I will quickly go down,
  I can learn to get drunk there as well as in town.

  So I'ze ta'en me a place at George and Blue Boar,
  Where the coach will set off in the morning at four,
  And as I must be up long afore it is light,
  I hope you'll not keep me here too late to night.




THE FUNNY WEDDING.

WHICH TOOK PLACE IN BRADFORD ON THE FIRST OF DECEMBER, 1851.


  Just give attention, old and young,
  And listen for awhile,
  I'll sing to you a funny song,
  Will sure to make you smile,
  It is about a circumstance
  Well known to all around,
  I mean the funny wedding
  That took place in Bradford town.


                    CHORUS.

    Such a funny sight in Bradford town,
      Was never seen before.

  It was from Whipsey that the people
    On that morning came,
  The aged couple there did live,
    You perhaps may know their name;
  This couple long had wanted to
    Enjoy each other's bed,
  So on that happy day they went
    To Bradford to get wed.
                Such a funny wedding.

  They often told their tales of love,
    At length, good lack-a-day,
  Old Johnny said to Betty,
    "Love, this is our wedding day."
  Such mirth and fun in Bradford town,
    The people did never see,
  For John is sixty-five years old,
    And Betty seventy-three.
                Such a funny wedding.

  Invitations were sent round to their
    Neighbours and their friends,
  And earnestly requested them
    Their wedding to attend;
  So on the first day of December,
    They collected in their forces,
  Some mounted upon donkeys' backs,
    And others upon horses.
                Such a funny wedding.

  To see this funny wedding
    Thousands gathered round,
  For in a grand procession
    They march'd into the town;
  Some with soot mustachios,
    Others with their faces black,
  And another with a monkey
    Stuft with straw upon his back.
                Such a funny wedding.

  There was some had got red jackets on,
    And others had got blue,
  With rummy caps and three-cock'd hats,
    They seem'd a jovial crew,
  And as they came along the street,
    The people they did start,
  And laugh to see old John and
    Betty riding in a cart.
                Such a funny wedding.

  At last they came up to the church,
    And the cart did stand,
  While John and Betty both got out,
    As you shall understand;
  He led her to the altar
    And plac'd her by his side,
  They took the oath, and Johnny then
    Claim'd Betty for his bride.
                Such a funny wedding.

  When the marriage it was over,
    Devoid of care or pain,
  The procession got in readiness
    For to return again.
  With John and Betty in the cart
    They made a grand display,
  And as they homeward did return
    The fifes and drums did play.
                Such a funny wedding.

  Now John and Betty have got wed,
    Let's hope they will agree,
  In unity and harmony
    Always happy be,
  And in nine months' time,
    May they have a daughter or a son
  Mark'd with this grand procession,
    And December on its bum.

        And such a funny wedding may
          They live to see again.




THE FLYING DUTCHMAN.[250]


  You sportsmen all both great and small, one moment now attend,
  And listen with attention to these verses I have penn'd,
  'Tis of the Flying Dutchman I mean to sing my lay,
  And tell you all the prizes too that he has borne away.
      To the Flying Dutchman drink success who has so nobly run,
      He's beat the famous Voltigeur and show'd them how 'twas done.

  The first place was Newmarket the Flying Dutchman run,
  Where the July stake and a sweepstake of 400_l_. he won;
  And then he went to Liverpool, believe me what I say,
  A sweepstake of 1200_l_. the Dutchman bore away.
                      To the Flying Dutchman, &c.

  At Doncaster in 1848, the truth I do unfold,
  He carried off the champion stakes, likewise the two year old;
  And then in 1849 he went to Epsom town,
  And won the Derby stake 6,320_l_.
                      To the Flying Dutchman, &c.

  Then in July, at Liverpool, no horse would with him run,
  He walked over twice and there 850_l_. he won;
  From there he went to Doncaster, and through the pelting rain,
  With Charley Marlow on his back the Ledger did obtain.
                      To the Flying Dutchman, &c.

  The foal stakes then at Doncaster, which was 400_l_. more,
  No horse would run against him so the Dutchman he walked o'er;
  Then at Newmarket he was match'd, but the Dutchman, I believe,
  A forfeit of 500_l_. from Honeycomb received.
                      To the Flying Dutchman, &c.

  Then for the Belivor stake the famous Flying Dutchman ran,
  He took the prize; then at Ascot Heath the Emperor's cup he won;
  And at Goodwood too he won the prize, then to Doncaster came up,
  He there was beat by Voltigeur running for the cup.
                      To the Flying Dutchman, &c.

  Upon the thirteenth day of May in 1851,
  The Flying Dutchman and Voltigeur upon York[251] race course did run,
  'Twas for a thousand sovereigns, believe me what I say,
  Which the Flying Dutchman has won and borne the prize away.
                      To the Flying Dutchman, &c.

  No other horse was ever known to do what he has done,
  For more than twenty thousand pounds in prizes he has won;
  With Marlow mounted on his back, believe me what I say,
  He never run a race but one, but he took the prize away.
                      To the Flying Dutchman, &c.

  So to conclude and make an end, and finish up my song,
  Unto the brave lord Eglinton, Flying Dutchman does belong,
  So fill your glass and let it pass, and give a loud huzza,
  For the Flying Dutchman stands unrivalled at the present day.
                      To the Flying Dutchman, &c.

FOOTNOTES:

[Footnote 250: From a broadside _penes me_, printed and sold by Jas.
Lindsay, Glasgow.]

[Footnote 251: This event, which drew upwards of 50,000 persons to the
course, was a two mile match, for 1000_l_., between the earl of
Eglinton's horse Flying Dutchman, by Bay Middleton, five years old,
carrying 8st. 8 1/2-lb; and the earl of Zetland's horse Voltigeur, by
Voltaire, four years old, carrying 8st. The former horse won by about a
length.]




THE YORKSHIREMAN IN LONDON.[252]


  When first in London I arriv'd
      On a visit, on a visit;
  When first in London I arriv'd
      'Midst heavy rain and thunder,
  I 'spied a bonny lass in green,
      The bonniest lass I'd ever seen,
  I'd oft heard tell of a beauteous queen,
      Dash me, thinks I, I've found her.

  I look'd at her, she look'd at me,
      So bewitching, so bewitching;
  I look'd at her, she look'd at me,
      I look'd so very simple.
  Her cheeks were like the blooming rose,
      Which on the hedge neglected blows,
  Her eyes were black as any sloes,
      And near her mouth a dimple.

  I stood stock still, she did the same,
      Gazing on her, gazing on her;
  I stood stock still, she did the same,
      Thinks I, I've made a blunder;
  Just then her cheeks turn'd deadly pale,
      Says I, "My love, what d'ye ail?"
  Then she told me a dismal tale
      That she was scar'd with thunder.

  "Madam," says I, and made my bow,
      Scraping to her, scraping to her;
  "Madam," says I, and made my bow,
      "I'd quite forgotten t' weather;
  But if you will permission give
      I'll see you home, where-e'er you live;"
  So she pop'd her arm right thro' my sleeve,
      And off we set tegether.

  A bonny wild goose chase we had,
      In an out sir, in an out sir;
  A bonny wild goose chase we had,
      The bollar stones so gall'd me;
  At last she brought me to a door
      Where twenty lasses, hey, or more,
  Came out to have a better glore
      At bumkin as they call'd me.

  "Walk in," said she, "kind sir," to me,
      Quite politely, quite politely;
  "Walk in," said she, "kind sir," to me.
      "Poor chap," say they, "he's undone."
  "Walk in," says she. "No, no," says I,
      "For I've got other fish to fry,
  I've seen you home, so now good bye,
      I'm Yorkshire, tho' in London."

  My pockets soon I rummish'd over,
      Cautious ever, cautious ever;
  My pockets soon I rummish'd over,
      Found there a diamond ring, sir;
  For I had this precaution took,
      In each to stick a small fish hook;
  So in grapling for my pocket book,
      The barb had strip'd her finger.

  Three weeks I've been in London town,
      Living idle, living idle;
  Three weeks I've been in London town,
      It's time to go to work, sir;
  For I've sold the ring, and here's the brass,
      I have not play'd the silly ass;
  It will do to toast a London lass,
      When I get back to Yorkshire.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 252: From _A Garland of New Songs_, printed by J. Marshall, in
the Old Flesh-Market, Newcastle-upon-Tyne (_circa_ 1810).]




THE GREAT EXHIBITION; OR, PRINCE

ALBERT'S CURIOSITY SHOP.

An entirely new comic song, written and sung by Mr. Burford, at the
Theatre, Whitby, on the occasion of the Foresters' bespeak, and since
received every evening with great applause.


  I am a native of fair Dublin city,
    To Whitby I've come for a spree;
  I've been up to London to visit
    The Great Crystal Palace, d'ye see:
  For there's wonders one top of the other,
    In that wonderful place to be seen,
  Faith the brains of a saint it would bother,
    To know what the government mean.

    You may talk of your fancy bazaars,
      If you're passing Hyde Park only stop;
    Faith it's there that you'll stare with surprise,
      At Prince Albert's Curiosity Shop.

  For the first day the charge is a guinea,
    For those that have guineas to pay,
  But I dont think I'll be such a ninny
    As throw my good money away;
  On the next day the charge is five shillings,
    But the queen wont be there I'll be bound,
  For altho' she's got plenty of money
    She'll not like to part with her _crown_.
                            You may talk, &c.

  I'll sing you of some of the wonders,
    I hear has been sent from this town:
  Of life boats I'm sure there is plenty,
    And not one of which will go down.
  There's Smales, Swallow, Baker, and Slater,
    Have studied upon their own scale,
  But the one that should weather all storms,
    Is that which was made by a Gale.
                            You may talk, &c.

  There's a genius to make weather merry--
    Merryweather's the genius I mean;
  Foul and fair be his studies together,
    Ere long his success will be seen.
  At Staithes' they say there's a man too,
    Has made a rat trap goes on springs;
  And another a new reefing jacket,
    Provided with cast metal wings.
                            You may talk, &c.

  No doubt but you've heard of St Hilda,
    That wonderful Saint long ago,
  She cut all the heads off the serpents,
    With her wonderful sword at a blow.
  The petrified sword has been found too,
    To the Great Exhibition it's gone,
  For no doubt there'll be plenty of serpents
    From all parts to visit the town.
                            You may talk, &c.

  I've got some fresh news for your seamen
    To keep up your hearts my good lads,
  For there's vessels to sail out of Whitby,
    In which you'll be sure of your brads.
  I've been watching the vessels that's passing,
    That justice to seamen allows,
  And so you'll be sure of your wages
    For they've got £4 10_s_. on their bows.
                            You may talk, &c.

  May every success attend Whitby,
    May the star of prosperity shine
  On your labours to prove your industry,
    May it gain for your town a good name;
  May misfortune's clouds never lower
    On either your commerce or trade;
  May your seamen gain all they desire,
    And stick to the terms they have made.
                            You may talk, &c.




THE LORD OF SALTAIRE.

BY ABRAHAM HOLROYD.[253]

This song was composed to commemorate an event which created much
sensation in Yorkshire, and indeed throughout all England, in
September, 1853; this was the inauguration and opening of a palace
dedicated to industry near Shipley in Airedale. These works were built
for the manufacture of alpaca and mohair fabrics, and named Saltaire
from Salt--the name of the owner, Titus Salt, esq., M.P. for
Bradford--and Aire, the name of the river on which they were erected.
The buildings cover an area of eleven and half acres, will contain 1,200
looms capable of producing 30,000 yards of cloth, or mixed goods, per
day, or nearly 18 miles of cloth, and employing about 5,000 people.

The town of Saltaire is built upon the best principles, including every
convenience necessary for promoting the health and comfort of the
population. Not only will it be a model town as regards its spacious
squares and streets, grounds for recreation, schools, and church, (which
has lately been opened, and cost 11,000_l_., and is perhaps the most
beautiful in its interior of any church in Yorkshire,) its baths and
washhouses, and all that philanthropy can suggest, or art supply, to
further improvement.


  Roll on, gentle Aire, in thy beauty,
    Renowned in story and song,
  The subject of many a ditty,
    From Nicholson's[254] musical tongue:
  But a greater than he hath arisen,
    Who has link'd thy name with his own,
  He will render thee famous for ages,
    And thou wilt to millions be known.

      Then let us all join in the chorus,
        And sing of the qualities rare,
      Of one who by nature is noble,--
        And hail him the lord of Saltaire!

  He's rear'd up a palace to Labour,
    Will equal the Cæsars of old,
  The church and the school and the cottage,
    And lavish'd his thousands of gold:
  Where the workman may live and be happy,
    Enjoying the fruit of his hand;
  In contentment, in comfort, and plenty,
    Secure as a peer of the land.
                      Then let us all join, &c.

  From Peru he's brought the alpaca--
    From Asia's plains the mohair--
  With skill has wrought both into beauty,
    Priz'd much by the wealthy and fair:
  He has velvets, and camlets, and lustres,
    With them there is none can compare;
  Then off, off with your hats and your bonnets,
    Hurrah for the lord of Saltaire.
                      Hip, hip, and all join, &c.

FOOTNOTES:

[Footnote 253: Of Bradford, author of "Flow on, Gentle Aire," "Liberty,
a Vision," &c.]

[Footnote 254: John Nicholson, "the Airedale Poet," who was accidentally
drowned in the Aire on the 13 April, 1843, on the spot where the works
now stand. A new edition of his poems, with a sketch of his life and
writings, by John James, F.S.A., has recently been published, for the
benefit of his widow.]




A REMARKABLE CIRCUMSTANCE CONNECTED WITH BRETTON HALL.[255]


  At Bretton Hall, near Wakefield, known so well,
  Sir William Wentworth Blackett once did dwell;
  That mansion was his own; there, with his bride,
  In pomp and splendour, he did once reside.
  Yet, in the midst of all that he possest,
  A rambling mind disturb'd sir William's breast;
  His lady and his home he left behind;
  Says he, "The end of this wide world I'll find;
  The earth's extensive, but, you may depend on't,
  Before e'er I return, I'll find the end on't."
  So he embark'd on board a ship, we find,
  And, sailing, left her ladyship behind,
  Who oft in sorrow did his absence mourn,
  And sighing said, "Oh, that he would return!
  For, be his voyage rough or smooth at sea,
  It is a cruel bitter blast to me."
  Sir William, he rolls on through winds and waves;
  Undaunted, he all kinds of weather braves;
  Nor his strange project e'er relinquish'd he,
  Till one-and-twenty years he'd been at sea;
  Then, p'rhaps, he thought, "Good lack! the world is round;
  The end is nowhere--so it can't be found;
  And, as I'm weary of this wild-goose chase,
  At home again, e'er long I'll show my face."
  Then off he set, but little was aware,
  What would transpire on his arrival there:
  For while sir William rov'd as here express'd,
  Another "Sir," his lady thus address'd:--
  "Sir William's gone, (ne'er to return again)
  Past this world's end, which long he sought in vain,
  There's not a doubt he's found the end of life;
  But don't be troubled; you shall be my wife."
  She listen'd, till at length she gave consent,
  And straightway to church then this couple went.
  Sir William does about this wedding hear,
  As he unto his journey's end draws near;
  And thus he does within his mind reflect:--
  "This sly usurper I shall now detect:
  Soon shall he know, though much against his will,
  At Bretton hall I have dominion still;
  Those woods and fertile fields my own I call,
  With this magnificent, this splendid hall:
  And now I come to claim them as my own,
  Though, by my dress, not from a beggar known;
  My clothes are turn'd to rags, and, by the weather,
  My skin is tann'd till it resembles leather;
  So now I'll act the beggar bold and rude,
  And at this wedding boldly I'll intrude,
  And, though admittance I may be denied,
  I'll rob the merry bridegroom of his bride."
  Then at his own hall door one rap he gave,
  Resolv'd the inmates' charity to crave.
  So he presented his request, 'tis said,
  And they presented him--a crust of bread!
  The bread he took, and then, to their surprise,
  He ask'd the servants for some beer likewise.
  "No, no," said they, "beer we shall give you none;
  You saucy drunken vagabond, begone!"
  At length (with much ado) some beer he got,
  And quickly he return'd the empty pot;
  And straightway then into the hall went he,
  And said, he wish'd her ladyship to see.
  "You can by no means see her," answer'd they,
  "She's newly married! 'tis her wedding-day!"
  "Married!" the feigned beggarman replied,
  "Then I'll not go till I have seen the bride."
  Then tow'rds the dining-room his course he bent,
  The servants quick pursued with one consent,
  And seized him, with intent to turn him out.
  "Come back, you villain; what are you about?"
  "About my bus'ness, to be sure," quoth he,
  "The room I'll enter, and the bride I'll see."
  "We'll see you out of doors," the servants said;
  And now of course, a clam'rous din they made,
  Just then, the bride, on hearing such a clatter,
  Open'd the door, to see what was the matter.
  This noble beggar thus obtain'd a sight
  Of her who erstwhile was his heart's delight,
  He viewed her in her nuptial garments dress'd,
  And did of her a glass of wine request,
  Which she denied--who little did suppose
  The ragged stranger was her wealthy spouse;
  Then straight into the dining-room he went,
  And down he sat among the guests content.
  Says he, "You'll grant me my request I know;
  A glass of wine I'll have before I go."
  The bride at length, complied with his request,
  Thus thinking to despatch the ragged guest,
  But when he did this glass of wine obtain,
  He drank and fill'd, and drank and fill'd again.
  The guests astonish'd and disgusted, view'd,
  Whilst he proceeded to be far more rude;
  Around the bride's fair neck he threw his arm,
  And gave a kiss, which did her much alarm,
  On him she frown'd, and threaten'd him with law,
  Says he, "Your threats I value not a straw:
  My conduct to reprove is all in vain,
  For what I've done I mean to do again.
  Madam, your bridegroom's in an awkward case;
  This night I do intend to take his place."
  And while upon her countenance he pores,
  The guests agree to kick him out of doors.
  "The deuce is in the beggarman," they cried;
  "He means to either beg or steal the bride."
  "No, no," says he, "I claim her as my own."
  He smil'd and then he did himself make known,
  Saying, "William Wentworth Blackett is my name;
  For my long absence I'm much to blame;
  But safe and sound I have return'd at last,
  So let's forgive each other all that's past."
  The bride did her first bridegroom recognise;
  With joy transported, to his arms she flies;
  And, whilst they tenderly each other kiss,
  The disappointed bridegroom they dismiss;
  Who inwardly did his hard case lament,
  Hung down his head, and out of door he went.
  "I'm robb'd of this fair jewel, now," thinks he;
  "How cruel is this tender spouse to me!"
  Awhile he scratched his head, then heaved a sigh,
  Then eyed the hall again, and wip'd his eye.
  Sir William freely did forgive his wife;
  They liv'd together till the end of life.
  My honest story I must now conclude,
  Which may by some be as a fiction view'd;
  But, sirs, the boots in which sir William went,
  Are kept in memory of that event;
  The very hat he wore preserv'd has been,
  At Bretton hall--where they may yet be seen.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 255: From a broadside _penes me_, without printer's name.]




THE BUTCHER TURNED DEVIL.[256]


  Come neighbours draw near and listen awhile,
  I will sing you a song it will cause you to smile,
  It's concerning Old Nick, he's the father of evil,
  He has long been well known by the name of the devil.

  In the village of Empsall, near to Wakefield town,
  To an old woman through the chimney he came down,
  If you'd been there to see him, you would have thought it funny,
  But he frightened the old woman, for he wanted all her money.

  Says he, "Woman take warning, for now I tell you plain,
  To-morrow night at twelve o'clock I'll visit you again,
  One hundred bright sovereigns for me you must prepare,
  Or else with me then you must go, to a place you may guess where."

  Then up thro' the chimney he vanished from her sight,
  And she went to the Wakefield bank as soon as it was light,
  "You must pay me one hundred pounds," to the bankers she did say.
  "You ought to give us notice, you can't have it to-day."

  O then she wept most bitterly and told them her tale,
  How the devil he would fetch her, or her money without fail,
  Says the banker, "I will help you, though I beg you will be still,
  And I'll apprehend the devil and send him to the tread-mill."

  At Empsall a great thundering noise was heard again that night;
  The devil down the chimney came with his long horns and a light,
  Two men that were in readiness seized him in a trice,
  And they held the devil just as fast, as if he'd been in a vice.

  Next day great crowds of people went to see the devil there,
  But they say he changed his shape, and so it did appear,
  For when he found the old woman safe, so that he could not touch her,
  He lost his horns and tail, and turned out to be a butcher!

  The devil often has been blamed when innocent, 'tis true,
  But now he is caught in the fact, they will give him his due,
  And since he bears such a bad name, there's no doubt but they will
  Keep him prisoner, as long as he lives, at Wakefield tread-mill.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 256: From a broadside _penes me_, printed by J. Harkness, of
Preston and Liverpool.]




SONG.


  When I was a wee little totterin bairn,
    An' had nobbut just gitten short frocks;
  When to gang I at first was beginnin to lairn,
    On my brow I gat monie hard knocks:
  For se waik, an' se silly, an' helpless was I,
    I was always a tumblin down then,
  While me mother wald twattle me gently, an' cry,
    "Honey, Jenny, tak' care o' thysen."

  But when I grew bigger, an' gat to be strang,
    'At I cannily ran all about
  By mysen, whor I lik'd, then I always mud gang,
    Without bein' tell'd about ought.
  When however I com to be sixteen year auld,
    An' rattled an' ramp'd amang men.
  My mother wud call o' me in, an' wald scauld,
    An' cry--"Huzzy! tak' care o' thysen."

  I've a sweetheart comes now upo' Setterday neeghts,
    An' he swears 'at he'll mak' me his wife,
  My mam grows se stingy, she scaulds and she flytes,
    An' twitters me out o' my life.
  But she may leuk sour, an' cansait hersen wise,
    An' preach again likin young men;
  Sen I'se grown a woman, her clack I'll despise,
    An' I'se--marry!--tak' care o' mysen.




COLONEL THOMPSON'S VOLUNTEERS.[257]


  As we march'd down to Scarbro' on the fourteenth of June,
  The weather it was warm, and the soldiers in full bloom;
  There it was my good fortune to meet my dearest dear,
  For my heart was stole away by colonel Thompson's volunteer.

  My father and my mother confined me in my room,
  When I jump'd out of the window, and ran into the town,
  Where it was my good fortune, to meet my dearest dear,
  The man that stole my heart was colonel Thompson's volunteer.

  Then in came George Etherington all with his bugle horn,
  He said he'd seen the prettiest girl that ever sun shone on,
  Her cheeks they were like roses, she is beautiful and fair,
  And she says she'll march with none but colonel Thompson's volunteer.

  Then in came captain Carter, and unto them did say,
  That he had seen the prettiest girl, of any there to-day,
  Her eyes were black as jet, and her hair it hung so tight,
  And she says she'll march with none but colonel Thompson's men this
    night.

  Our officers are loyal, they are men of courage bold,
  Their clothing is of scarlet and turned up with gold,
  It's I could wash the linen to please my dearest dear,
  When I was in the field with colonel Thompson's volunteer.

  Our ladies they love music, our captain gives command,
  They play the prettiest marches of all the royal bands,
  They play the sweetest music that ever my ears did hear,
  For my heart was stole away by colonel Thompson's volunteer.

  I'll bid adieu to father, likewise to mother too,
  I'll never forsake my soldier but unto him prove true,
  And I'll range the country over with the lad that I love dear,
  Since I'm bound in wedlock's bonds to colonel Thompson's volunteer.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 257: From a broadside _penes me_, printed by Forth,
Pocklington.]




THE SLEDMERE POACHERS.[258]


  Come, all you gallant poaching lads, and gan alang with me,
  And let's away to Sledmere woods, some game for to see;
  It's far and near, and what they say it's more to feel than see,
  So come, my gallant poaching lads, and gan alang with me.


CHORUS.

    We are all brave poaching lads, our names we dare not tell,
    And if we meet the keeper, boys, we'll make his head to swell.

  On the fifth of November last, it being a star-light night,
  The time it was appointed, boys, that we were all to meet,
  When at twelve o'clock at midnight, boys, we all did fire a gun,
  And soon, my lads, it's we did hear, old hares begin to run.

  We have a dog, they call him Sharp, he Sledmere woods did stray,
  The keeper he fell in with him and fain would him betray;
  He fired two barrels at the dog, intending him to kill,
  But by his strength and speed of foot he tript across the hill.

  All on one side and both his thighs he wounded him full sore,
  Before we reached home that night with blood was covered o'er;
  On recovering of his strength again, revenged for evermore,
  There's never a hare shall him escape that runs on Sledmere shore.

  We have a lad, they call him Jim, he's lame on all one leg,
  Soon as the gun is shoulder'd up, his leg begins to wag;
  When the gun presented fire, and the bird came tumbling down,
  This lad he kick'd him with his club before he reached the ground.

  So as we as march'd up Burlington road, we loaded every gun,
  Saying if we meet a keeper bold we'll make him for to run,
  For we are all bright Sledmere lads, our names we will not tell,
  But if we meet a keeper bold we'll make his head to swell.

  We landed into Cherry woods; we went straight up the walk;
  We peak'd the pheasants in the trees, so softly we did talk;
  We mark'd all out, what we did see, till we return'd again,
  For we were going to Colleywoodbro' to fetch away the game.

  Come, all you gallant poaching lads, if I must have my will,
  Before we try to shoot this night let's try some hares to kill;
  For shooting, you very well know, it makes terrible sound,
  So if we shoot before we hunt we shall disturb the ground.

  We landed into Suddaby fields, to set we did begin,
  Our dog he was so restless there, we scarce could keep him in;
  But when our dog we did let loose, 'tis true they call him Watch,
  And before we left that ground that night he fifteen hares did catch.

  So it's eight cock-pheasants and five hens, all these we marked right
    well,
  We never fired gun that night but down a pheasant fell.
  You gentlemen wanting pheasants, unto me you must apply,
  Both hares and pheasants you shall have, and them right speedily.

  So now, my lads, it's we'll gan yam, we'll take the nearest way,
  And if we meet a keeper bold his body we will bray;
  For we are all bright Sledmere lads, our names we will not tell,
  But if we meet a keeper bold his head we'll make to swell.

  So come, you poaching lads, who love to hunt the game,
  And let us fix a time when we will meet again;
  For at Colleywoodbro' there's plenty of game, but we'll gan no more,
  The next port shall be Kirby Hill where hares do run by scores.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 258: From a broadside in the possession of Mr. Hailstone, in
addition to those mentioned in note p. 125, _ante_.]




THE YORKSHIRE CONCERT.[259]


  I'ze a Yorkshireman just come to town,
    And my coming to town was a gay day,
  For fortune has here set me down
    Waiting gentleman to a fine lady.
  My lady gives galas and routs,
    And her treats of the town are the talks here;
  But nothing i'ze seen thereabouts,
    Equal one that was given in Yorkshire.
      Rum ti iddity iddity, rum ti iddity ido,
      Rum ti iddity iddity, fal de ral, lal de ral lido.

  Johnny Fig was a white and green grocer,
    In business as brisk as an eel, sir,
  None than John in the shop could stick closer,
    But his wife thought it quite ungenteel, sir.
  Her neighbours resolv'd to cut out, sir,
    And astonish the rustic parishioners;
  She invited them all to a rout sir,
    And ax'd all the village musicioners.
                                      Rum ti, &c.

  The company met gay as larks, sir,
    Drawn forth all as fine as blown roses;
  The concert commenc'd with the clark, sir,
    Who chanted the Vicar and Moses;
  The barber sung Gallery of Wigs, sir,
    The gentlemen all said 'twas the dandy;
  And the ladies encor'd Johnny Fig, sir,
    Who volunteer'd Drops of Brandy.
                                      Rum ti, &c.

  The baker he sung a good batch,
    While the lawyer for harmony willing,
  While the bailiff he join'd in the catch,
    And the notes of the butcher were killing;
  The wheelwright he put in his spoke,
    The schoolmaster flogg'd on with fury;
  The coachman he play'd the Black Joke,
    And the fish-woman sung a Bravura.
                                      Rum ti, &c.

  To strike the assembly with wonder,
    Madam Fig scream'd a song loud as Boreas,
  Soon wak'd farmer Thrasher's dog Thunder,
    Who starting up, joined in the chorus;
  While a donkey the melody marking,
    Chim'd in too, which made a wag say, sir,
  "Attend to the rector of Barking's
    Duet with the vicar of Bray, sir."
                                      Rum ti, &c.

  A brine tub half full of beef, salted,
    Madam Fig had trick'd out for a seat, sir,
  Where the taylor to sing was exalted,
    But the cov'ring crack'd under his feet, sir;
  Snip was sous'd in the brine, but, soon rising,
    Bawl'd out, while they laugh'd at his grief, sir,
  "Is it a matter so monstrous surprising,
    To see pickled cabbage with beef, sir?"
                                      Rum ti, &c.

  Then a ball after the concert gave way,
    And for dancing no souls could be riper,
  So struck up the Devil to Pay,
    While Johnny Fig paid the piper;
  But the best thing came after the ball,
    For finish the whole with perfection,
  Madam Fig ax'd the gentlefolks all
    To sup on a cold collation.
                                      Rum ti, &c.

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 259: From _a Garland of New Songs_, printed by J. Marshall, in
the Old Flesh Market, Newcastle-upon-Tyne.]




THE SOLDIER IN YORKSHIRE.


  There was a jolly soldier down into Yorkshire went,
  And for to court a pretty girl was his whole intent;
  He courted her, and told her he lov'd her as his life,
  Poor girl, she little thought he had another wife.

  He courted her six months, with behaviour mild and kind;
  Her friends and relations did like him, so we find;
  He said, "My dearest Peggy, I love you as my life,
  And if your friends are willing, you shall be my wife."

  Her father and her mother they both did agree,
  That joined in wedlock this couple should be;
  I, like a silly girl, consented to the same,
  I thought to have a husband none could me blame.

  The time being come, they both of them were wed,
  So lovingly together, as many people said,
  But early the next morning my heart was like to break,
  To hear the dismal story to me he did relate.

  "Farewell, my dearest Peggy, it cuts me to the heart,
  For I do love you dearly, to think that we must part;
  I rue what I have done, my love, for me pray don't moan,
  I have got a loving wife and children at home."

  With that the poor girl she screamed outright,
  "So hard is my fortune, I am ruined quite;
  I am married to a false man that's got another wife;
  I shall have no other comfort or joy of my life."

  Then raving distracted, she ran and tore her hair,
  Since she must part with him, she fell into despair.
  Her mother, she laments, and her father full of woe,
  "I'm sorry I gave consent to ruin my daughter so."

  The soldier he went home unto his loving wife;
  Thinking she might hear of this, bethought to end the strife,
  Saying, "I'm married to another, to tell you I'm loath."
  "You villain," said she, "you have ruin'd us both."

  The wife took it to heart, she bade the world adieu,
  To think he lov'd another, and prov'd to her untrue;
  Now he is forsaken, and thus doth sigh and mourn,
  "Not long ago I had two wives, but now, alas! I've none."

  Come all you brave young soldiers, a warning take by me,
  And ne'er delude young women and bring to misery;
  Think on your wife and children, and ne'er defile the bed,
  And never wed the second wife, until the first is dead.




AW NIVIR CAN CALL HUR MY WIFE.[260]

BY THE AUTHOR OF "NATTERIN NAN," ETC.


  Tune, "_Come Whoam to thi Childer an Me_."

  Aw'm a weyver ya knaw, an awf deead,
    So aw du all at iver aw can
  Ta put away aat o' my heead
    The thowts an the aims of a man!
  Eight shillin a wick's whot aw arn,
    When aw've varry gooid wark an full time,
  An aw think it a sorry consarn
    Fur a hearty young chap in his prime!

  But ar maister says things is as well
    As they hae been, ur ivir can be;
  An aw happen sud think soa mysel,
    If he'd nobud swop places wi me;
  But he's welcome ta all he can get,
    Aw begrudge him o' noan o' his brass,
  An aw'm nowt bud a madlin ta fret,
    Ur ta dream o' yond bewtiful lass!

  Aw nivir can call hur my wife,
    My love aw sal nivir mak knawn,
  Yit the sorra that darkens hur life
    Thraws a shadda across o' my awn;
  An aw'm suar when hur heart is at eeas,
    Thear is sunshine an singin i' mine,
  An misfortunes may come as they pleeas,
    Bud they nivir can mak ma repine.

  That Chartist wur nowt bud a sloap,
    Aw wur fooild be his speeches an rhymes,
  His promises wattered my hoap,
    An aw leng'd fur his sunshiny times;
  But aw feel 'at my dearist desire
    Is withrin within ma away,
  Like an ivy-stem trailin' it mire,
    An deein' fur t' want of a stay!

  When aw laid i' my bed day an neet,
    An wur geen up by t'doctur fur deead--
  God bless hur--shoo'd come wi' a leet
    An a basin o' grewil an breead;
  An aw once thowt aw'd aht wi' it all,
    Bud sa kindly shoo chattud an smiled,
  Aw wur fain tu turn ovvur ta t'wall,
    An ta bluther an sob like a child!

  An aw said as aw thowt of her een,
    Each breeter fur't tear at wur in't;
  It's a sin ta be nivir furgeen
    Ta yoke hur ta famine an stint;
  So aw'l e'en travel forrud thru life,
    Like a man thru a desert unknawn,
  Aw mun ne'er hev a hoam an a wife,
    Bud my sorras will all be my awn!

  Soa aw' trudge on aloan as aw owt,
    An whativir my troubles may be,
  They'll be sweetened, my lass, wi' the thowt
    That aw've nivir browt trouble ta thee;
  Yit a burd hes its young uns ta guard,
    A wild beast, a mate in his den;
  An aw cannot but think that its hard--
    Nay, deng it, aw'm roarin agen!

FOOTNOTE:

[Footnote 260: _Yorkshire Songs_--No. I. (of a series to be published by
Abraham Holroyd, Westgate, Bradford), 1860.]




A GLOSSARY.


    Aaot, _out_.
    Aar, _our_.
    Abaht, aboot, _about_.
    Addled, _earned_.
    Afoor, _before_.
    Agean, _against_.
    Ah, _I_.
    Ahle, _I'll_.
    Aht, _out_.
    Ands, _and has_.
    Anen, anenst, _near_ or _against_.
    Arn, _to earn_.
    Ast, _asked_.
    Asta, _have you_.
    Aw, _I_.
    Awd, auld, _old_.
    Awf, _half_.
    Awlus, aulas, _always_.
    Awn, _own_.


    Baan, _bone_.
    Bairns, _children_.
    Baith, _both_.
    Bane, _near to_.
    Baon, _going_.
    Barn, _a child_.
    Be, bi, _by_.
    Behawfe, _by half_.
    Beng-up, _showy_.
    Berrid, _buried_.
    Bide, _bear_.
    Bods, burds, _birds_.
    Brack, _broke_.
    Breet, _bright_.
    Brewt, _brute_.
    Bud, _but_.


    Capped, _surprised_.
    Cawd, _cold_.
    Cleas, _clothes_.
    Coil, _coal_.
    Cos, _because_.
    Cud, _could_.


    Dahnreyt, _downright_.
    Daht, _doubt_.
    Daz, _to stupify_.
    Deant, _do not_.
    Dee, _to die_.
    Deeane, _done_.
    Dew, _to do_.
    Diddle, _to cheat_.
    Ding, _to throw_.
    Don't, _put it on_.
    Draand, _drowned_.
    Du, _do_.
    Dun, _done_.


    Elpin, _helping_.
    Ev, _have_.


    Fahve, _five_.
    Farden, _farthing_.
    Feeal, _fool_.
    Fettle, _to put in order, prepare_.
    Fiahne, _fine_.
    Fick, _to struggle_.
    Fitterd, _fluttered_.
    Fleead, _flayed_.
    Fleear, _the floor_.
    Fleg, _a flag_.
    Flick, _flitch_.
    Freetened, _frightened_.


    Gaon, _gone_.
    Getten, gitten, _has got_.
    Gi, gie, _give_.
    Gimma, _give me_.
    Gloare, _to stare, look earnestly_.
    Goas, gooas, _goes_.
    Goom, _the gum_.


    Haa, _how_.
    Haase, haaos, _house_.
    Hah, _how_.
    Heead, _the head_.
    Het, _have it_.
    His-sel _or_ his sen, _himself_.
    Hod, _to hold_.


    Intul, _into_.
    Issant, _is not_.
    Ista, _art thou_, _are you_.
    Ith, _in the_.
    Ivven, _even_.
    Ivver, _ever_.
    Ize, _I am_.
    Izzent, _is not_.


    Kahnd, _kind_.
    Karkiss, _the body_.


    Lair, _a barn_.
    Leeght, leet, _light_.
    Lig, _to lie down_.
    Lin, _linen_.
    Loase, _to loose_.
    Lug, _the ear_, also _to pull_.
    Luke, _to look_.


    Ma, _me_.
    Mah, _my_.
    Mebby, _perhaps_.
    Meeast, _most_.
    Meenleet, _moonlight_.
    Mesen, mysen, _myself_.
    Mesht, _bruised_.
    Minnits, _minutes_.
    Mitch, _much_.
    Monny, _many_.
    Mud, _might_.
    Mun, _must_.


    Nah, _now_.
    Nattry, _bad tempered_.
    Neet _or_ neeght, _night_.
    Neiv, _the hand_.
    Nivvir, _never_.
    Noa, noan, _no, none_.
    Noas, _the nose_.
    Nobbut, _only_.
    Nont, _nothing_.
    Nowt, _nothing_.
    Nubdy, _nobody_.


    Oth, _on the_.
    Ovvur, _over_.
    Owlus, _always_.
    Owt, _ought_.


    Pratly, _partly_.


    Rade, _rode_.
    Raff, _low company_.
    Raond, _round_.


    Sark, shark, _a shirt_, (_but at page 271, it evidently means a
        surplice_).
    Sarten, _certain_.
    Seean, _soon_.
    Seeat, _soot_.
    Seeghts, _sights_.
    Seet, _see it_.
    Sell, _self_.
    Sen, _since_.
    Shap, _shape_.
    Shauted, shaated, _shouted_.
    Shoo, _she_.
    Shraad, _a shroud_.
    Shutterd, _slipped_ or _dropped out_.
    Sin, _since_.
    Sitch, _such_.
    Slap-shod, _loosely shod_.
    Sloap, _a cheat_.
    Smoak, _suspect_.
    Sneck, _a latch of a door_.
    Sooin, _soon_.
    Sope, _a sup, drop_.
    Sorra, _sorrow_.
    Sowl, _soul_.
    Spanking, _quite new, stylish_.
    Spenisjuce, _spanish juice_.
    Steven, _to speak loud_.
    Storance, _stirrings_.
    Suddent, _should not_.
    Sum, _some_.
    Sumhah, _somehow_.
    Sune, _soon_.
    Swillin, _washing out_.
    Swop, _to exchange_.


    Ta, _to_.
    Taon, _town_.
    Teak, _took_.
    Teea, _to_.
    Teern, _to turn_.
    Teld, _told_.
    Tem'd, _poured_.
    Tengin, _stinging_.
    Tengs, _tongs_.
    Tew, _trouble, to crumple_.
    Tha, _they, thou_.
    Thall, tharl, _thou wilt_.
    Thart, _thou art_.
    Thel, _they will_.
    Tiv, _to_.
    Toth, _to the_.
    Towd, _the old_.
    Trigg'd, _filled_.
    Tu, _too_.
    Tull, _to_.
    Tummle, _to fall_.
    Tussell, _to struggle_.
    'Twad, _it would_.
    T'warst, _the worst_.
    Twea, _two_.
    'Twor, _it was_.


    Ud, _would_.
    Ur, _or_.
    Uther, _the other_.


    Wad, _would_.
    Wah, whar, _where, who_.
    Wake, waik, _weak_.
    War, _were_.
    Wark, _to ache, to work_.
    Warse, _worse_.
    Weame, _the belly_.
    Weea, _who_.
    Weel, weal, _well_.
    Weent, _will not_.
    Wee'se, _we shall_.
    Wer, _were_.
    Weshin, _washing_.
    Whahl, _while_.
    Whewin, _whistling, blowing_.
    Whoame, _home_.
    Whoor, _where_.
    Wick, _alive_.
    Withaht, _without_.
    Witta, _wilt thou_.
    Woddunt, _would not_.
    Wolivver (while ever), _so long as_.
    Wor, _was_.
    Wor'nt, _was not_.
    Worrit, _tease by complaining_.
    Wo't, _who it_.
    Wots, _oats_.
    Wur, _our, were_.
    Wursen, _ourselves_.
    Wurt, _was the_.


    Ya, _you_.
    Yah, _one_.
    Yal, _whole, ale_.
    Yam, _home_.
    Yan, _one_.
    Yance, _once_.
    Y'are, _you are_.
    Yat, _hot, a gate_.
    Yatton, _the village of Ayton_, commonly called "_canny Yatton_."
    Yol, _you will_.
    Yor, _your_.
    Yo've, _you have_.




  _Recently published, 8vo. with Illustrations, cloth, price 15s. Large
  paper, half bound, £1 5s._

  THE HISTORY AND ANTIQUITIES OF

  NORTH ALLERTON

  IN THE COUNTY OF YORK.

  BY C. J. DAVISON INGLEDEW,

  OF THE MIDDLE TEMPLE.

     _Opinions of the Press._


"Here a stranger may take up his abode in a single town, and study under
a skilful master the story of its career and the details of its progress
in good or bad fortune."--_Athenæum_.

"The public and private history of North Allerton, its antiquities,
public buildings, registers, folk-lore, are duly recorded in a way to
gratify its inhabitants, and the curiosity of all who are interested in
the history of this ancient town."--_Notes and Queries_.

"The author evinces great research, and presents to the reader much
valuable historical and antiquarian information."--_Yorkshire Gazette_.

"Though professedly a local history, this work is rich in the records of
national events."--_Leeds Intelligencer_.

"A book which will not only be interesting to all the inhabitants of the
North Riding, but must also prove very helpful to any future historian
of England."--_Leeds Mercury_.

"Possesses the high merit of being a book for interesting and delightful
perusal by any reader."--_Newcastle Journal_.

"Full of anecdote, story, and song--manners and customs--folklore and
family history."--_Gateshead Observer_.

"To archæological study generally it is no inconsiderable
contribution."--_Clerical Journal_.

"A great addition to the explorist, as well as to the advanced
historical scholar, and is as completely interesting as it is useful."
_Military Spectator_.

       *       *       *       *       *


LONDON:--BELL AND DALDY, 186, FLEET STREET.

       *       *       *       *       *

  +------------------------------------------------------------------+
  |                                                                  |
  | Tags that surround the word _Hartford Courant._ indicate italics.|
  |                                                                  |
  | Transcriber's notes:                                             |
  |                                                                  |
  | Footnote: 202. Typo'dipsute' changed to 'dispute'.               |
  |                                                                  |
  +------------------------------------------------------------------+





End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Ballads and Songs of Yorkshire, by 
C. J. Davison Ingledew

*** END OF THIS PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK THE BALLADS AND SONGS OF YORKSHIRE ***

***** This file should be named 47607-0.txt or 47607-0.zip *****
This and all associated files of various formats will be found in:
        http://www.gutenberg.org/4/7/6/0/47607/

Produced by David Edwards, Jane Robins and the Online
Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This
book was produced from scanned images of public domain
material from the Google Print project.)


Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions
will be renamed.

Creating the works from public domain print editions means that no
one owns a United States copyright in these works, so the Foundation
(and you!) can copy and distribute it in the United States without
permission and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
set forth in the General Terms of Use part of this license, apply to
copying and distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works to
protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
Gutenberg is a registered trademark, and may not be used if you
charge for the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
do not charge anything for copies of this eBook, complying with the
rules is very easy.  You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose
such as creation of derivative works, reports, performances and
research.  They may be modified and printed and given away--you may do
practically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
subject to the trademark license, especially commercial
redistribution.



*** START: FULL LICENSE ***

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full Project
Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
  www.gutenberg.org/license.


Section 1.  General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works

1.A.  By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or destroy
all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound by the
terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.

1.B.  "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark.  It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
paragraph 1.C below.  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.  See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C.  The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection of Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works.  Nearly all the individual works in the
collection are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
individual work is in the public domain in the United States and you are
located in the United States, we do not claim a right to prevent you from
copying, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
works based on the work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
are removed.  Of course, we hope that you will support the Project
Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
this agreement for keeping the Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the work.  You can easily comply with the terms of this agreement by
keeping this work in the same format with its attached full Project
Gutenberg-tm License when you share it without charge with others.

1.D.  The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
a constant state of change.  If you are outside the United States, check
the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this agreement
before downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
creating derivative works based on this work or any other Project
Gutenberg-tm work.  The Foundation makes no representations concerning
the copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
States.

1.E.  Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1.  The following sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear prominently
whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work on which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
copied or distributed:

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
almost no restrictions whatsoever.  You may copy it, give it away or
re-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
with this eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org

1.E.2.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
from the public domain (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
posted with permission of the copyright holder), the work can be copied
and distributed to anyone in the United States without paying any fees
or charges.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
with the phrase "Project Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
work, you must comply either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
through 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
Project Gutenberg-tm trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
1.E.9.

1.E.3.  If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
terms imposed by the copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works posted with the
permission of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.

1.E.4.  Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5.  Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6.  You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including any
word processing or hypertext form.  However, if you provide access to or
distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
"Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official version
posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
request, of the work in its original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
form.  Any alternate format must include the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7.  Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8.  You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
that

- You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
     the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
     you already use to calculate your applicable taxes.  The fee is
     owed to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
     has agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the
     Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation.  Royalty payments
     must be paid within 60 days following each date on which you
     prepare (or are legally required to prepare) your periodic tax
     returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
     sent to the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
     address specified in Section 4, "Information about donations to
     the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."

- You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
     you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
     does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
     License.  You must require such a user to return or
     destroy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
     and discontinue all use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.

- You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
     money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
     electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days
     of receipt of the work.

- You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
     distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9.  If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work or group of works on different terms than are set
forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
both the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
Hart, the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark.  Contact the
Foundation as set forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
public domain works in creating the Project Gutenberg-tm
collection.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may contain
"Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or other medium, a
computer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by
your equipment.

1.F.2.  LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees.  YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3.  LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium with
your written explanation.  The person or entity that provided you with
the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
refund.  If you received the work electronically, the person or entity
providing it to you may choose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4.  Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO OTHER
WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement violates the
law of the state applicable to this agreement, the agreement shall be
interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
the applicable state law.  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
provision of this agreement shall not void the remaining provisions.

1.F.6.  INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in accordance
with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
harmless from all liability, costs and expenses, including legal fees,
that arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
work, (b) alteration, modification, or additions or deletions to any
Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any Defect you cause.


Section  2.  Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations from
people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
and how your efforts and donations can help, see Sections 3 and 4
and the Foundation information page at www.gutenberg.org


Section 3.  Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive
Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541.  Contributions to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
permitted by U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
Fairbanks, AK, 99712., but its volunteers and employees are scattered
throughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at 809
North 1500 West, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887.  Email
contact links and up to date contact information can be found at the
Foundation's web site and official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

For additional contact information:
     Dr. Gregory B. Newby
     Chief Executive and Director
     gbnewby@pglaf.org

Section 4.  Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without wide
spread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements.  We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
SEND DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any
particular state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States.  U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
methods and addresses.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations.
To donate, please visit:  www.gutenberg.org/donate


Section 5.  General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
works.

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
concept of a library of electronic works that could be freely shared
with anyone.  For forty years, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
unless a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper edition.

Most people start at our Web site which has the main PG search facility:

     www.gutenberg.org

This Web site includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.
